The Project Gutenberg EBook of The Girl's Own Paper, Vol. XX. No. 1013,
May 27, 1899, by Various

This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
almost no restrictions whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
with this eBook or online at www.gutenberg.org/license


Title: The Girl's Own Paper, Vol. XX. No. 1013, May 27, 1899

Author: Various

Release Date: August 4, 2019 [EBook #60053]

Language: English

Character set encoding: UTF-8

*** START OF THIS PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK THE GIRL'S OWN PAPER ***




Produced by Susan Skinner, Chris Curnow, Pamela Patten and
the Online Distributed Proofreading Team at
http://www.pgdp.net









[Illustration: THE GIRL’S OWN PAPER

VOL. XX.—No. 1013.]     MAY 27, 1899.      [PRICE ONE PENNY.]




[Illustration: AT THE HELM.]

_All rights reserved._]




THE HOUSE WITH THE VERANDAH.

BY ISABELLA FYVIE MAYO, Author of “Other People’s Stairs,” “Her Object
in Life,” etc.


CHAPTER IX

A WORM AT THE ROOTS.

Each looked at the other, aghast. An expression as of sudden
enlightenment flitted across the boyish face of Tom Black; but nobody
noticed that.

“That sound means some accident!” exclaimed Lucy, hurrying out of the
room. Miss Latimer followed her. Mr. Somerset and young Black stayed
behind, Mr. Somerset holding back little Hugh.

But they only lingered for a moment. A cry from Lucy and a pungent
smell of burning which saluted their nostrils set them too running
downstairs.

Mrs. Challoner and Miss Latimer were bending over the body of Mrs.
Morison, prostrate just outside the dining-room door. A japanned tray
containing knives and forks and spoons, scattered over the floor,
explained the crash which had followed the heavy fall. Little Hugh
shrieked, “Mrs. Morison is dead!” and began to cry. But she breathed
stertorously.

“She has had a fit,” Lucy said. “Working over the big fire has brought
it on.”

Wilfrid Somerset caught up his hat.

“I know the nearest doctor’s!” he exclaimed, and, putting young Black
aside, he hirpled off, self-consciousness suspended in his eager desire
to be of service.

“Mrs. Morison isn’t dead, dear,” Miss Latimer reassured little Hugh;
“but she is very ill, and you must not interrupt us while we take care
of her.”

She led him into the dining-room and bade him watch at the window
for the coming of Mr. Somerset and the doctor. Then she returned to
Lucy. Young Black had got some water, and Lucy was dashing it on her
servant’s face. But, though she struggled and writhed under the chill,
it did not rouse her.

“What was she bringing up these things for?” asked Lucy, looking round
at the scattered cutlery. “She knew I had set out the table already.”

“It’s likely there was a good deal of mental confusion before the fit
came,” suggested the old governess.

Tom Black stood over the prostrate figure and the kneeling ladies.
It was true he had fetched the water, but otherwise he did not seem
eagerly sympathetic. Suddenly he said—

“There’s something on fire somewhere!”

“Certainly there is,” assented Lucy, her senses regaining their power
of attention. “I think it must be downstairs. I can’t move.” (She was
trying to support the heavy, tossing head.) “Will you both go and see
what is burning, and do your best with it?”

As the old lady and the youth descended the kitchen stair he whispered
to her—

“That woman is tipsy.”

“Oh, surely not!” Miss Latimer replied. “Mrs. Challoner has told me she
is an excellent servant and a respectable person.”

“She is tipsy,” he repeated. “I saw it when I came in. But I didn’t
think she was quite so bad as this.”

It was a terrible picture that met their eyes as they entered that
kitchen, which only a few hours before had been so bright and trim.
A big fire was burning, and a clothes-rail—covered with damask
table-napkins, among which hung an old rag mat—had been put so close
to the bars that one of the napkins was nearly consumed, two or three
were scorched, and the rag rug was smouldering. To draw back the
clothes-rail and to throw the burning mat into the sink was the work of
a moment, and effectually ended a great danger.

The hearth was blurred with trodden cinders and spotted with grease.
There were two pots standing on the range, one containing burnt-up
porridge, and the other full of water with something floating in it
which looked like a rag. Miss Latimer hurriedly opened the oven door,
fully expecting to see a cindered fowl; but the oven was empty. Going
to a cupboard she discovered the little turkey nicely trussed. That had
been done the previous night, and it had not been touched since. Miss
Latimer quietly lifted it down and put it into the oven. Dinner would
be certainly late; but it would be the earlier the sooner one made a
beginning.

“I fear you are right, after all,” she said to Tom Black. “Yet this fit
may have been coming on, and that may have stopped her work, and—— Ah!”

Tom had also been making an investigation, and as she was speaking, he
held up before her shocked eyes a bottle of whisky. It was still in the
paper in which it had been sold; but it was almost empty.

“There’s the doctor and Mr. Somerset!” Miss Latimer exclaimed with
a tone of relief. “Now we shall soon know the truth. Anyway, we’re
not wanted upstairs just this minute—we’d be only in the way. So let
us try to get a little to the bottom of things down here. I know how
keenly Mrs. Challoner will feel all this,” she said, confiding in the
youth whom she had never seen till half an hour before, but for whose
domestic help she now appealed as if it were the most natural thing in
the world. “Will you just see what is in that basin beside you?”

Tom lifted the cover, peering gingerly.

“I believe this is the pudding,” he said.

“Dear me; very likely,” said Miss Latimer.

She went back to the fireplace, and, dipping her fingers into the pot
of water, drew forth the floating rag. It was the pudding-cloth neatly
fastened up; only the pudding had never been inside!

“And what is that strange noise I hear?” asked the old lady, gazing
around.

“It is the cat,” said Tom. “She is under the dresser, and she keeps
‘swearing.’”

The young man seemed rather afraid to approach the indignant animal;
but the old lady bravely put in her hand and drew pussy out.

“No wonder she ‘swears,’ poor dear!” she observed. “Hot oil or grease
has been dropped on her, and has burned away about an inch of fur. I
don’t know what we can do for her, especially just now. But, at least,
we’ll give her a saucer of milk as a sign of sympathy.”

At that moment the uncertain step of Wilfrid Somerset was heard on the
kitchen stair.

“Mrs. Challoner asks me to get the cushions off the armchair,” he said,
“and I’m afraid you’ll be wanted,” he added, addressing Tom, “for I’m a
poor, useless creature where bodily strength is required.”

Without a moment’s hesitation the doctor had diagnosed Mrs. Morison’s
“fit.”

“She’s been drinking,” he said laconically.

“But there is no smell of spirit,” pleaded Lucy, reluctant to lose
faith in the unhappy woman.

“No,” said the doctor; “but there’s the scent of the little lozenges
which gentlemen take to hide the smell of tobacco. That’s the secret,
ma’am. This case doesn’t want any treatment save to be put on a safe
couch and allowed ‘to sleep it off,’ when I trust she will awake
properly ashamed of herself.”

It was impossible to carry the heavy inert body to the servant’s
bedroom upstairs. But there was a little closet-like room at the back
of the hall, empty save for a few ferns and polled plants which Lucy
kept there. In that room Mr. Somerset arranged all the cushions he
could find in the kitchen, which were not a few, since they included
the mattress of a chair-bedstead which stood there in its chair
capacity. Then the doctor and Tom Black carried in the unconscious
woman, while poor Lucy gathered up the scattered cutlery, which
included a broken knife, a toasting-fork, and an oyster opener.

“I am so sorry to have called you out on Christmas Day, and for what,
after all, was no work of yours,” said Lucy to the doctor as he came
back through the hall, drawing down his cuffs and straightening his
coat.

He gave his head a queer little shake.

“It’s hard to know what is a doctor’s work and what isn’t,” he said.
“But it’s always a doctor’s work to be useful, if not to the case, why,
then, to its caretaker. Get rid of that woman directly she wakes, Mrs.
Challoner. Such as she are at the bottom of two-thirds of the awful
accidents which happen in the world.”

“She might have broken her neck if she had fallen on the stairs,”
observed Lucy.

“And as she didn’t, she may live to break some other body’s neck,” said
the doctor as he went away.

Lucy opened the dining-room door and went in, to find poor little Hugh
still dutifully watching at the window as Miss Latimer had bidden him.
And there was the dining-table, with its gleaming napery and sparkling
crystal, standing there as in mockery of the squalid scene which had
just been enacted.

“And is it to this misery that I have invited my guests?” cried Lucy.
Even as she spoke her eye fell on her little desk, with her unfinished
letter to Charlie peeping out of the blotting-case. That letter could
not be finished now. It could never be sent. Then the memory of all
she had believed and hoped rolled back on her. If there is anything
calculated to give us the sensation of despair, it is the recollection
of thanksgiving offered for what in the end has proved disastrous!

For one moment Lucy sat down on a chair, covered her face and wept.
She might have had “a good cry,” but for her sudden realisation that
she was not alone, that her guests were in the house, and that she had
a duty to discharge towards them. She sprang up and dashed away her
tears. Where had the guests gone? What were they doing? She had been
so occupied with the unhappy drunkard that she had not realised what
else had gone on around her. In her confusion she went first to the
drawing-room. The door was wide open and the room was empty, an album
lying on the floor just as she had dropped it. She paused, puzzled.
Then she heard sounds below. It was evident that her friends were all
in the kitchen.

There she found them, busy. The pudding was already in the pot. The
burned serviettes were put aside. Tom Black had carried the rag mat out
to the scullery, and Wilfrid Somerset was washing plates.

Lucy cried out in dismay; but they all laughed good-humouredly. The
disaster had happened, they said, and now they’d got to make the best
of it.

“What is the use of having old friends, if they can’t do such a thing
as this?” asked Miss Latimer.

But Mr. Black, anyhow, was not an old friend, protested Lucy.

No, Mr. Somerset admitted that—at least, he hadn’t been only an hour
ago. “I think he is now,” he added. “Hours count for years sometimes.”

Lucy resolutely pulled herself together. She, too, must make the best
of it. Though, as a hostess, she was humiliated and defeated, she must
still be the hostess, and try to extract a smile out of the cruel
situation. For the time she must put this unhappy woman out of her
thoughts, along with what might come on the morrow and the utter upset
of all her plans for the future. She must try to turn the household
wreck into an impromptu picnic.

She tried and succeeded perfectly, so far at least as Tom Black and
Hugh were concerned. In half an hour those two were laughing and
running to and fro as if there could not be a better Christmas game
than tidying a disordered room and pushing on a belated dinner.

Tom Black thought in his own mind what a jolly woman Mrs. Challoner was
not to be a bit put out by what would have utterly upset some people.

Miss Latimer and Wilfrid Somerset knew better than that; they knew
what dramatisations life sometimes forces upon us, and how costly such
performances are.

But they nobly seconded Lucy in her determination to put a fair face on
things. The dinner was cooked in time and set upon the table with the
informal decency which prevails in houses where “the family do their
own work.”

Tom Black really enjoyed himself a great deal more than he had expected
he would when in prospect of the ordinary dinner-party. He actually
took courage to say that he thought it would be far better fun if
people always came prepared to get ready their own festivity, instead
of sitting talking about nothing and looking through stereoscopes.

Wilfrid Somerset replied that he believed something of the sort was
regularly done in some parts of Canada and the New England States.

“But where it is done, the whole construction of society is different
from what it is in London,” said Miss Latimer. “And it is where things
are half one way and half another that somebody has to suffer cruelly,”
she added.

She, a breadwinning woman all her days, knew the strain which had come
upon Lucy, and could understand how these few hours were wasting forces
which should have been conserved to suffice for the productive labour
of weeks. For Lucy’s sake, she was truly thankful when the effort was
over—when little Hugh had gone to bed, when Tom Black had said good-bye
and had departed in the best of spirits, and when, left only to her two
old and trusted friends, Lucy could drop the mask of cheerfulness and
be the anxious, shaken creature she really was.

“Well,” sighed Lucy, “Charlie is sure to have thought of us to-day; but
certainly his imagination has never pictured the reality!”

The miserable Mrs. Morison was sleeping quietly now, and was not
likely to waken until morning. Miss Latimer declared that she would
remain with Lucy if Mr. Somerset would leave word at her lodgings that
she was not to be expected that night.

He urged the two ladies to go to bed directly he departed. They both
needed rest, and he felt sure they would not be disturbed. It was good
advice; but they were too nervous to take it. They might sleep heavily
in their upper chamber, and the culprit might waken and steal out, or
she might rise and commit suicide.

So they made themselves as comfortable as they could in the
dining-room, dozing off and waking and talking in whispers to each
other, till suddenly they roused with a start. The house was full of
the dull grey light of winter dawn. There was a slow heavy footfall in
the passage.

The culprit stood before them, unkempt, dishevelled, pale, but once
more in her right mind.

“Oh, Mrs. Morison!” cried Lucy. “How could you do this thing? How could
you?” and Lucy began to weep bitterly.

“I’ve nothing to say for myself, mem, nothing at all!” said the woman
heavily, with no sign of feeling except what was conveyed in the utter
absence of such sign. “But I’m just going to get your breakfasts for
you. You shall have them all right. Then you can do what you like with
me.”

The coffee she set before them was dainty, and the yellow fish savoury,
and the toast brown and crisp. The breakfast almost choked Lucy. She
still liked this woman—still felt drawn to the something good and
kind which again looked out of the grey eyes even to-day, dim and
reddened as they were. She would have liked to give her another chance,
surrounded by strict conditions and solemn pledges; but she knew that
could not be done in the little house with the verandah. For there was
no doubt that this was no first and abnormal outbreak, but simply the
crisis of a constant tendency—the tumultuous outbreak of restrained
craving.

This would take years to cure, if in a woman of this one’s age it could
be ever wholly cured. Clearly this could not be Lucy’s work, since it
was absolutely incompatible with her direct duties as Charlie’s wife
and Hugh’s mother.

She shuddered to realise how easily she might have been so lulled into
false security as to have left Hugh for an hour or two in the charge
of this well-behaved, kindly woman, perhaps to find her home a heap of
cinders and her child a charred corpse!

They had scarcely finished breakfast when Wilfrid Somerset drove up
in his cab. He had felt anxious lest morning might bring some violent
and distressing scene. He was soon satisfied that there was little to
fear on that head. But he was urgent that Mrs. Morison should leave the
house at once. Lucy feared she had but a few shillings left, and in her
present depressed state was only too likely to spend those in bringing
more shame upon herself. So Mr. Somerset’s advice was that the cousin,
the Willesden plumber, should be communicated with. Mr. Somerset
charged himself with the transmission of the telegram, and worded it
with much tact and policy.

Before evening, just as the shadows were deepening, the cousin’s wife
arrived.

She expressed great disgust at “Jessie’s” lapse. But she did not need
it to be explained. She evidently knew what was to be expected. All
that she could say was that she had really hoped “Jessie” had learned
more wisdom at last. They had done all they could for her. They had
thought her cured. She had “kept straight” for so many weeks. They had
never let her go out without one of their children with her, and they
had kept all her money from her. She had called on Jessie, poor body,
on the day she thought she would get her wages, and had taken them
away, and was keeping them for her. Jessie was quite willing for one to
do that, if one took her at the right time. She could not think what
“Jessie” had done to get money, for she had said she gave up all.

“I paid her a month’s wages a few days in advance,” explained Mrs.
Challoner; “and, when I did so, she told me that you had called to
borrow money from her, and how gladly she had spared it.”

The cousin looked up at Mrs. Challoner, hesitated for a moment, and
said—

“She didn’t say that till she knew you were going to pay her in
advance, did she?”

“No, she did not,” Mrs. Challoner admitted. “Nor did she ask me for the
advance. I offered it.”

“That’s it,” said the cousin. “The craving was on her, and the moment
she saw a way to satisfy it, she began to tell lies. She’s as true as
daylight at any other time, and as honest.”

“I’m so sorry I gave her that money,” sighed Lucy, forgetting for the
moment that if such a revelation was to come, then the sooner it came
the better.

“Oh, it wasn’t having the money that did it!” answered the other
reassuringly. “As she told a lie the fit had come, and if she hadn’t
got drunk one way, why, she would another! Once she actually pawned my
little girl’s boots. And she so fond of the child! ’Tisn’t her fault,
poor dear! We mustn’t judge her. It’s just like a disease.”

“But how could you think of allowing her to use you as a reference, and
yet of not warning me of her terrible weakness?” said Mrs. Challoner.

The woman’s eyes wandered a little.

“Well, we didn’t want her to mention us!” she answered. “I’ll engage
she didn’t till after you’d seen the Edinburgh letters. Jessie came
home so full of you and the little gentleman that I thought, ‘Here’s a
place where she’ll be happy and will keep right if ever she will.’ And
when the lady came to inquire, my husband he kep’ out of the way. He
said he wasn’t going to mix hisself in it; but I said to him, ‘It’s our
Christian duty to do the best we can for our own. Ain’t we told we’ve
got to bear each other’s burdens?’ says I.”

Lucy drew her breath hard. How was one to meet this perverted
sentiment, this putting of “charity,” as it were, upside down?

“But don’t you see you were wrong to further her coming into my house
without telling me the truth about her?” she urged. “She might have
burned my house, she might have killed my boy! Could you not see that
you were not dealing justly by me?”

“I don’t know about ‘justly,’” said the woman tartly, with a sneer on
the last word. “It’s our Christian duty to have charity and cover a
multitude of sins. If I’d told about Jessie’s weakness, nobody would
have taken her; and, as she’s spent her bit of money already, there’s
nothing and nobody between her and the workhouse but just ourselves,
and my husband doesn’t like to have his flesh and blood made a pauper.
Yet it’s rather hard he should have to take from me and his own
children to keep her.”

Lucy’s heart fainted within her at this strange mixture of warped
exegesis, perverted family pride, and private self-interest. Yet she
made another attempt to get the matter set in a right light.

“It is very kind of you and your husband to wish to help Jessie,” she
said; “but then, if you are willing to sacrifice yourselves in this
direction, it must really be yourselves whom you do sacrifice, and
not other people, whom you mislead into being sacrificed blindfold.
Our sacrifices must be costly to ourselves and not to others. If poor
Jessie is really, as you seem to say, the irresponsible victim of her
vice, just as if it was a disease, it would be truer kindness on your
part to sacrifice your pride for her real good. You are only giving
her freedom to do some great harm to other people, even if you feel it
right to endure such an example as hers among your own children. But I
do not think you need let her go to the workhouse. I believe there are
people willing and able to undertake the care and cure of such cases.
If you like, I will write to some of these. But meantime, as you helped
Jessie to get into my house, I must really ask you to take her away
with you at once.”

“Oh, yes, that’s the way burdens are always thrown back on poor folk!”
muttered the woman.

“I am throwing no burden on you,” said Lucy, with a firmness which
surprised herself. “I am simply handing back a great risk which you
deceitfully imposed upon me. I think we have nothing more to discuss,”
and thereupon she rang the kitchen bell, and summoned Jessie into the
presence of her mistress and her cousin.

(_To be continued._)




A HAPPY HEALTHY GIRLHOOD.

BY “MEDICUS” (DR. GORDON-STABLES, R.N.).


PART II.

    “’Tis now the summer of your youth;
    Time has not cropt the roses from your cheek,
    Though sorrow may have washed them.”

                                          _Moore._

The rose is a sweetly beautiful flower, and no matter where it grows
it somehow always charms the human eye, always appeals to the human
heart. Lovely it is in the garden, especially perhaps at early morning
when gemmed by dew, the crystalline tears left by the dying night, or
at eventide, when the colour in a rose-garden seems to reflect the
tints of the sunset clouds. Roses of all classes and kinds are lovely,
grow they where they may, on castle lawn or draping the walls of the
humblest cottage. And just as sweet and tender are those lovely buds
and blossoms of the crimson _rosa canina_ that bedeck and mantle our
hedges in the month of June.

Children are ofttimes comparable to roses—girl-children I mean—mere
opening buds, and they ought to be none the less beautiful and
innocent-looking when older, but still in their teens. Ah, those
“teens,” would we not all prefer to remain that age and never to grow
older! I suppose angels are all and always in their teens, and the
saints in Heaven too!

But descending from romance, with which a medical man ought to have
nothing to do, the stern reality, life, to a girl in her teens is
often a trying time. This, for many reasons which I shall now briefly
consider and advise upon.

Every mother, if not her children, has often heard the word “heredity”
mentioned. The offspring is part and parcel of the parents, and
inherits, somewhat changed or modified perhaps, not only their good
qualities, their strength of body, brain, and constitution, but their
diseases also, if they have any. There is no mystery about that, as
some medical men tell us. It would be a mystery if it were the reverse.
If you take a cutting off a pure red rose, you could scarcely expect it
when grown into a bush to develop yellow roses. It is part and parcel
of the parent, and so is the child. But separate life and the mode or
manner of living may alter even inherited complaints, or prevent their
showing forth at all. It does not follow as a constant rule that the
children of, say, scrofulous parents shall be consumptive, or that
those of parents addicted to drink and dishonesty shall follow the
parental lead. It is this fact that gives one such hope in treating
the ailments and guiding the young lives of those who may be supposed
to be born with a taint of impure blood.

Note, mother, please, that I have said “_young_ lives” in my last
sentence, because it is when young, and only then, that much good can
be done to combat the evils of heredity.

We are sometimes told that the particular ailment handed down may
skip one generation and appear in the next. This should only give us
additional certainty that the trouble may be eradicated entirely.
For Nature does not skip generations in the manner some scientists
would have us believe. If an ailment, say phthisis or consumption, is
the trouble in one family and the children thereof escape, while the
grandchildren are attacked, one of two things may have happened; the
first generation of the afflicted ones had been reared in circumstances
inimical to the dispersing of the disorder, it lay latent in their
blood and revivified under circumstances favourable to it, in the
grandchildren, or—this is just as likely—the seed of the disease died
in the first generation, and the second were infected by ordinary
means. Phthisis is infectious: this should always be born in mind, and
a consumptive person should invariably sleep alone in the airiest and
best ventilated room in the house.

When I say that consumption is hereditary, I am of course showing you
that I am a believer in the microbe doctrine. So is every sensible man.
The microbes of phthisis may be carried in the breath from the sick to
the sound; or dried sputa—ever so little—may form dust and be breathed,
thus inoculating, as it were, the person who inhales it. Not of a
certainty, however, for there are many chances against those microbes,
even if breathed, finding their way into the blood. Healthy blood is
in itself a protection, for the white corpuscles thereof are veritable
tigers in miniature, and fall upon and destroy organisms that are
dangerous to the life or health of the individual. Moreover a disease
germ or seed of consumption cannot, in every case, even reach the
mucous membrance of the lungs, owing to the secretions therein which
sweep it away, if they do not actually destroy it. On the other hand a
weakly subject is far more likely to fall a victim to infection of any
kind than a strong. A consumptive mother may have several children,
all of which, bar one, are safe enough, though all must have inherited
the evil microbe or bacillus. And this is chiefly because one is more
delicate than the others.

But I deem it my duty to say here at once that a consumptive person
should never marry.

All mothers know, or ought to know, that consumption is caused by a
particular sort of matter called tubercle which, by way of getting rid
of it perhaps, Nature deposits in, say, the lungs of the young person.
This acts like a foreign body; that is, it may lie quiescent for a long
time, and as the child gets stronger, it may even be absorbed, but if
she catches cold, that wicked little lump of deposit is sought out and,
becoming inflamed, sets up mischief all around. It is coughed up, but
leaves an ulcer, and this forms a cavity, after which the end is not
far distant. But consumption in children, or the young either, is more
often caused by the deposit of tubercle in other parts of the body,
especially in the glands.

Now, the probability being that I shall devote a whole article to a
consideration of consumption, I need not do more here than generalise
and give a few words of good advice. I think, mater, that if this
advice proves of service to you and gives you hope, this health sermon
shall not have been written in vain.

“I’m afraid that my lassie is dwining,” said a Scottish mother to me
once. “What think you, doctor?”

I was only a very young fellow then, but had inherited a modicum of
common sense from most intelligent parents, so I took Mary in hand.

Mary was then sixteen, I but twenty, and although a medical student,
I could not have known a deal. The mother and daughter were country
cottagers, and being poor, the family doctor did not, probably could
not, devote overmuch time to the case. One thing, however, I objected
to: he kept pouring cod-liver oil into his patient, completely
deranging the stomach and rendering the digestion of the food a
complete impossibility.

From the very first week that Mary stopped the oil her appetite
improved, and—the old doctor stopped away. The case was mine therefore,
and I took no small pains with it. I thought that if there was any
chance of getting the girl over her trouble at all, it was by making
her strong. We live by food and not by physic, I argued—food and fresh
air.

Mary’s bedroom was a small one and downstairs; but there happened to
be a large attic or garret above, and the father being a handy man—and
Mary the only girl-child—he did as I told him, and made a large window
on the south side of the attic. Then it was completely cleared out and
cleaned out, the walls whitewashed and the floor well scrubbed. When
mats were put down here and there, and a nice bed at one side on which
the morning light could fall, the room was so far ready for occupation.

The mother wanted bed curtains and window curtains. I would hear of
neither. I shook my young head with an air of awe-inspiring profundity
as I tabooed the curtains. But I permitted any amount of artistic
though rural decoration. Mary had much taste, and the hours she spent
in making that attic into a boudoir were the best investment of time
possible, because they occupied her mind, and I would not let her
believe she was ill, or had the seeds of consumption in her system.
All she wanted, I said, was strength. And I really was not far wrong.
I gave her Hope instead of cod-liver oil. But I insisted upon her
being out of doors nearly all day long, wearing clothing to accord
with the state of the weather, but never fearing the cold. She was to
sleep, not in a draught, but with her window open. Her mother said, “My
conscience, doctor laddie!” at first, but I insisted.

All the medicine Mary had for the next twelve months could have been
placed inside a walnut shell. Her mental medicine was not neglected,
and this consisted of books to read—I gave her these—and light work to
do, chiefly out of doors, also pleasant quiet companionship.

Fresh air was the most important weapon I used to fight the trouble.
Next came food. Cream, butter, good milk, nice bacon, and suet
dumplings were ten thousand times better than expensive and fulsome
cod-liver oil. She had meat too, as much as she could take, with
vegetables—potatoes and greens—and bread.

Hygienic rules were most strictly carried out. The cottage, luckily,
was surrounded by bonnie country gardens, in which Mary spent much
of her time, not even fearing rain, because she wore a cloak—not
an india-rubber mackintosh, be assured—and strong boots, without
disease-producing goloshes. From top to bottom, from one end to
another, the house was kept spotlessly clean, free from dust, and dry.

Mary was no worse at the end of a month! Mary was better at the end
of three months!! Mary was well, and the blush of health was on her
cheeks, at the end of eighteen months!!!

The old-fashioned doctor never spoke to me after I put my foot on his
cod-liver oil. He used to pass me on the road like a speck of March
dust, and he told a friend of mine I was an insolent young dog. No
doubt he was right. I had all the faith and arrogance of youth, but—I
cured Mary.

It was at the end of the eighteen months I went to sea, and seven long
years elapsed before I saw her again. She was married, and had two
bonnie healthy children. She is living _still_, and her family too.

Now, mother, this is a true story, and I have only told it as a
proof of the benefits derivable from fatty and flesh-forming foods,
perfect hygiene, and fresh air indoors and out in cases of incipient
consumption; and not in these alone are such health-giving and curative
agents beneficial, but in all cases of chronic ill-health in young
girls.

In relating my little story of Mary, I may have seemed to disparage
cod-liver oil. I merely wish, however, to imply that it is only in
cases where it can be easily digested that it can do any good, and that
in all others it is positively injurious.

Mind this, mater, that the days have long gone past when people pinned
their faith on medicine alone in the cure of diseases. Indeed, mostly
every ailment of a chronic nature, if curable at all, has a better
chance if physic is left severely alone and a thorough system of
hygiene and dietetics adopted; for if medicine is taken, people as a
rule think that this is of greater consequence than good food and a
life spent in the fresh and open air.

What are called “peptonised foods” are often beneficial where there is
want of proper digestive power, or pepsin in the form of tablets may be
used. These are to be had at most respectable chemists, and the dose is
marked on the bottle.

The new food-medicines called vivol and marrol, so highly spoken of in
medical journals, should in many cases supersede the use of cod-liver
oil, or even shark-liver oil, in the case of a girl who does not seem
to be thriving.

The Scotch word “dwining” is very expressive. It was usually applied to
girls just entered on their teens, who do not appear to be healthy, and
are but little likely to make old bones. They are rather poor in flesh,
growing rather rapidly, perhaps, but not “building as they go,” as the
farmers say about rick-making. They have but little appetite, are pale
in face, flabby in substance, have little real life about them, and are
very thick-headed of a morning. They feel the cold much, and therefore
seldom have their bedrooms properly ventilated. Moreover, they do not
make bone. It is as if Nature said to herself, “I need not bone in the
case of this girl, for it will never be wanted.”

Well, in all cases of “dwining,” the fresh air and food treatment works
wonders.

I must call the attention of mothers of delicate girls to the fact that
there are in the market, and very largely advertised, pills containing
iron which kill thousands yearly. Iron, in the hands of a skilful
physician, who knows how and when to prescribe it, is often a valuable
tonic, but taken without precaution, as people do who see things
advertised and shored up with lies and so-called cures, it is a _most
dangerous_ and _poisonous drug_.

What is called anæmia or bloodlessness in girls sometimes gets the name
of “chlorosis” or “green sickness” from the peculiar appearance of the
skin. It is an exceedingly common complaint, and really the number of
white faces one sees in the streets of great cities, as girls hurry to
and from their work, is saddening. When one notices a face of this kind
in a beautiful carriage, the girl who owns it being perhaps wrapped up
in furs, one may put it down as a bad case. There is either some real
disease to account for it, or the girl is over-coddled, the laws of
hygiene and dietetics ruthlessly broken, and faith pinned on medicine
alone—a broken reed.

When the working girl is anæmic, her mother or whoever owns her must
see that she gets good food, that the system is kept regular in every
way, and that her room is clean, tidy and well-ventilated, with no
curtains on bed or windows.

All the weariness, all the heaviness, tiredness in the morning, the
low spirits, and even the neuralgic pains from which she suffers, will
vanish before a better diet if it is well regulated. But in such a
case, the daily bath—cold before breakfast—will often be the very first
thing to set her to rights.

If she can get down into the country and keep out of doors nearly all
day, so much the better, only hard exercise should be avoided.

Red meat does good in these cases. If this is too expensive to be had
in any quantity, plenty of milk should be used. Oatmeal is a cure
in itself in many cases. Bacon is good, especially the fat, and a
teaspoonful of Bovril should supplement this.

Peas meal, if it can be got in bulk and fresh, makes an excellent
staple of diet for many hard-working girls. It can be made into
porridge (thick), and eaten with butter and milk it is most nourishing
and delicious. The Aberdeen girls (factory hands, etc.) use a deal of
this, and no more wholesome, blooming and bonnie lassies are to be
found anywhere. Indeed, I have never yet seen any to match them. The
fresh and bracing sea air may account to some extent for their “caller”
looks, but, believe me, the diet has a deal to do with their health.

Nervousness is another hereditary complaint. Now although there are
a great many medicines that have an effect for good on the nervous
system, they need to be used with caution, and only in conjunction with
a well-regulated diet.

Rheumatism is still another heirloom that descends in families.

On both these subjects and others I shall speak at length in early
numbers of THE GIRL’S OWN PAPER, so those interested should look out
for my papers.




“OUR HERO.”

A TALE OF THE FRANCO-ENGLISH WAR NINETY YEARS AGO.

BY AGNES GIBERNE, Author of “Sun, Moon and Stars,” “The Girl at the
Dower House,” etc.


CHAPTER XXXIV.

As a heavy stone falling into a pond sends waves circling outward to
a distance, so the death of Sir John Moore at Coruña sent many a wave
of sorrow to the hearts of men, north and south, east and west. One
such wave found its way to the distant town of Verdun, where still
languished the détenus, taken captive in 1803, together with many later
Prisoners of War on parole, sent thither.

News in those days travelled slowly, and prisoners travelled more
slowly still. But a day arrived, though not till very many weeks after
the Battle of Coruña, when Jack Keene found himself within the ramparts
of Verdun.

It was spring; and he carried his right arm in a sling, and when he
moved a distinct limp might be seen. He had just been to report himself
at the citadel, and he now stood outside, meditating on his next move.

A rather young man, with a keen clever face, passed him quickly, then
pulled up, turning in his direction.

“I beg your pardon. Have you just arrived here?”

“Yes. You’re English. That’s right,” said Jack heartily. “I’m a
prisoner.”

“Can I be of service to you? Have you friends in the place?”

“Could you direct me to Colonel Baron’s house or lodgings?”

“Certainly. I know them all. My name is Curtis.”

“Ah! I have heard that name from Roy Baron.”

“Roy and I were great friends, when he was here. Anything you can tell
me about him will be welcome.”

Curtis looked questioningly, and Jack answered the look.

“My name is Keene. Roy and I have been through the Campaign in Spain
together, and on the retreat I was wounded and taken prisoner.”

Curtis held out his hand, to be grasped by Jack’s left.

“You have travelled all the way from Spain.”

“With a convoy of prisoners. Yes. Been a good while about it, too.
First part of the way in a waggon, after that on horseback. Tell me how
they all are here. I have heard nothing for ages.”

“I’ll come and show you the way. The Colonel keeps all right. Looks
older than he used, that’s all. Mrs. Baron is well. One fancied at the
time that Roy’s being sent to Bitche would kill her outright; but it
didn’t. Having to devote herself to Ivor was a mercy in disguise, I
don’t doubt. Kept her from dwelling on her own trouble. It was a vast
relief to them all, when the kind fellow, who got Roy away, came and
told them he’d seen the boy safe on board a vessel for England. He was
well rewarded by the Colonel, as you may suppose—not that he did it for
reward! But, of course, we don’t breathe a word about it in Verdun, for
the fellow’s own sake. Only, as I know them well, and as I know you
belong to them——”

Jack made a gesture of assent.

“Ivor was ill, was he not?”

“I daresay he would have been so anyhow, after the march from
Valenciennes; but the arrest of Roy was a finishing stroke. You won’t
find him looking good for much now. I suppose hardly anything could
have knocked him down like the death of Sir John Moore. It is a fearful
loss to the country. No man living could have been worse spared.”

Curtis paused, cast a glance at Jack, and changed the subject.

Presently they reached the house, where still the Barons lived, as ever
since their first arrival in Verdun.

“By-the-by, I’m not sure whether you’ll find them in,” he said. “The
Colonel at _appel_ said he was going to take Ivor with his wife for a
drive in the country, hoping it might do him good. It was worth trying.
But I think they may have returned before now.”

“You’re allowed to go where you will?”

“Why, no! _Douceurs_ are efficacious, however. Will you let me show you
the way upstairs?”

Jack hesitated.

“No, I understand. Of course, you’d rather see them first alone; and I
didn’t mean to go in. But you can’t mistake the room. First landing,
first door to the right.”

Curtis vanished, and Jack, obeying the directions, came to a door
slightly ajar. He pushed it wider, and went softly through.

It was a good-sized salon; empty, except for the presence of one man,
writing at a side table. By build and bearing, Jack recognised Ivor
instantly; but, finding himself unnoticed, he had a fancy not at once
to make his presence known. He drew a few steps nearer, and then stood
motionless. He had a good side-view of the other.

Jack studied him gravely, recalling the splendid physique and health of
the young Guardsman six years earlier. The physique was in a sense the
same; and the fine bearing of head and shoulders remained unaltered;
but the sharpened delicacy and pallor of the face impressed Jack
painfully, as did a streak of grey hair above the temple, a stamp of
habitual lassitude upon the brow, and the thinness of the strongly-made
right hand, which moved the pen. Jack began dimly to understand what
the long waiting and patience of these years had been.

Ivor seemed to become conscious of Jack’s gaze. He laid down his pen,
glanced round, and started up.

“Jack! Is it possible?”

“Just arrived,” remarked Jack, with an _insouciance_ which he was far
from feeling. “Come across Spain and France. Yes, wounded; but I’m
getting all right. Always was a tough subject, you know.”

“Where were you taken?”

“On the march, at Lugo. Two days off from Coruña. Got too far ahead of
my men. Wounded in the leg first; then, as I was defending myself, a
musket-ball broke my right arm. So I had to give in.”

“You are lame still. Sit down. You a prisoner, too! I hardly know how
to believe it.”

“Fortune of war, as our French friends would say. I’ve no right to
complain. Had my share, though ’tis a shame to be cut off from more of
it. Den, you’re looking very far from well.”

Denham did not heed the words.

“What of Roy?” he asked. “We have had no home-news for ages.”

“Roy is Ensign in my Regiment. Didn’t you know even that? Been with me
through this Campaign. He and I were in the Reserve—under _his_ eye”—in
a lower voice. “You have heard——”

“No particulars. The fact of a battle at Coruña—and—— Tell me all you
can.”

“You know that it was victory.”

“I know!”—in a stirred deep tone. “Not from the papers. French papers
never admit defeat. But—under him—how could it be otherwise?”

“It never _was_ otherwise. Never—once!”

Denham rested his face on both hands.

“Tell me all you know. We are cut off from everything here.”

Jack’s information was but partial. Before starting for France, he had
been kept by his wounds some time in the neighbourhood of Lugo; and
thus a few details of that heroic death had filtered round to him. It
was hard work for Jack to repeat them in a steady voice. Once Ivor
raised his head; and the dumb white sorrow of his look all but overcame
Jack’s fortitude. Then Ivor returned to his former position, and Jack
went on resolutely.

“That’s about all,” he said at length. “As much as I’ve heard yet....
He was his own grand self to the last!... It was the death he would
have chosen to die.... He always wished for it.... On the field—in
the moment of victory! But the loss to us—to England!... The best—the
noblest——”

Jack could say no more. Silence followed.

“Soult is a brave fellow. I heard that he was going to put up a
memorial stone[1]—to _him_! The French know what he was.”

Silence again. Denham had not stirred.

“He saved the Army—and baulked Napoleon. None except we who were there
could know the true state of things—the hopeless inefficiency of the
Spaniards. If he had had treble the number of men, and sufficient
supplies, England might have told a very different tale to-day. What
could be done by mortal man, under such circumstances, he did.”

Renewed silence. Jack studied the other gravely.

“You’re not fit for any more of this! When did you hear last from home?
So long? And you actually didn’t know that Roy was in Spain? Smart
young officer, too. He came in more than once for particular notice.”
Jack found himself verging on another allusion to the name which filled
their thoughts, and he turned to a fresh subject. “This Commandant of
yours at Verdun—Wirion—must be a queer chap, judging from reports of
him in the English papers.”

“He—was.”

“Not here now?”

“Courcelles is the present Commandant. Wirion went too far. There were
some scandalous cases—young Englishmen fleeced to the tune of five
thousand pounds.”

“What a vile shame!”

“Some of us made a stir, and facts were carried to headquarters. Wirion
was suspended, and he received a hint that he might as well put himself
out of the way. He acted upon the hint.”

“You mean that he——?”

“Shot himself.”

“Present man any improvement?”

“Oppressions are a degree more carefully veiled.”

Denham lifted his face from his hands with a sudden movement.

“What am I thinking about? You must be in want of food.”

“No, it’s all right. I went to a café on arrival. Your next meal is
soon enough for me.”

The absence of any inquiry after Polly was arousing Jack’s wonder. At
first, in the engrossing interest of that other subject, he had not
so much noticed Denham’s reticence, but now each minute it grew more
marked. Should he speak of Polly himself? No, that would not do. The
first mention ought to be from Ivor. So Jack decided, not realising
that his own silence might be misconstrued. Some questions as to his
wounds followed. Denham had moved to the large arm-chair, and was
leaning back with a spiritless look. Jack wondered anew, and at length
he could not resist putting forth a slight feeler.

“Are there no folks at home of whom you would fain hear?”

Ivor took the hint, looked straight at him, and said—

“Is Polly married yet?”

Jack’s breath was taken away. He was like one who has received a slap
in the face. This—from Ivor!

“Upon—my—word!” he ejaculated. “You take it coolly. Uncommon coolly!”

“I have at least a right to ask the question.”

For a moment Jack was very nearly in a passion, but the anger went down
as fast as it had arisen.

“Of course you don’t mean—— But, I say, what in the wide world made
you think of such a thing? Polly married! No, nor like to be.”

“I heard that she was engaged.”

“To whom?”

“The Admiral’s nephew—Peirce.”

“Who told you the lie?”

“Then—it was a lie!”

“You might have known it. Who told you?”

“One whom I should have counted trustworthy.”

“When did you hear the tale?”

“The year I was in Valenciennes.”

Jack recalled Roy’s description of Ivor’s return from that absence, and
he began to grasp the state of the case.

“When did you hear last from Polly herself?”

“Over two years ago. A letter which had been written before the date
when she was said to have become engaged.”

The last remnants of Jack’s anger died out. Two years of silence
following upon such a report!

“You have not writ yourself to Polly, this great while.”

“How could I—not speaking of this? And—how speak of it—if it were not
true?”

Silence again. Jack observed slowly, as he watched the other’s
colourless lips—

“Den, I’m going to be frank. ’Tis no case for half confidences. There
was a time, I’ll confess, when I had a doubt in my own mind of Polly’s
constancy. She’s a pretty creature, and she has had an uncommon lot of
admiration. But I wronged her, for she has been ever faithful to you,
and she has cared for none other. And the night before I started for
Spain, she and I talked together, and she spoke out plainly. She said
that, if you but asked her to come to Verdun she would come—and gladly.
She wondered, if indeed you cared for her still, that you had not so
done.”

A flush came, and Denham’s hand was held hard against his forehead.

“Never!” he said, in a low voice.

“You would not wish to have her out?”—incredulously.

“Never! If Polly were here, I might be taken from her in a week—sent to
a dungeon, leaving her unprotected.”

“I see! Nay, that would not do. Polly and you must wait a while longer.
But you will know now that she is waiting too.”

“It might be better for her—not——” Denham broke off.

“Your head is not often like this, I hope,” Jack said, in a concerned
tone.

“Not much respite lately.”

“Have you had medical advice? Can nothing be done?”

“One infallible remedy—if it might be had.”

“And that is?”

“Freedom—and Home.”

There was a short breath between the words, which said much, for Denham
was not given to sighing. Then voices outside told of the return of
Colonel and Mrs. Baron. Denham stood up, murmured a hasty apology, and
left the room.

“Poor fellow!” Jack said aloud.

(_To be continued._)

FOOTNOTES:

[1] Soult was recalled too soon, and this was done by Romana. In the
year 1814 a marble monument was erected by the English Government at
Coruña.




FROCKS FOR TO-MORROW.

BY “THE LADY DRESSMAKER”


I have seen nothing more wonderful this season than the combinations
of colour in dress. To hear the suggestions of your dressmaker on the
subject is to hear all your preconceived notions disputed and set at
naught. The other day I went with a friend to order a dress, and she
selected one of the new canvas grenadines, blue with a white silk spot.
The blue was rather a bright one, and the material very transparent,
and open in its meshes. There were several suggestions made for the
silken lining by the very clever woman who was attending to us—white,
pale blue, a darker blue, emerald green, pink, rose, red, lemon,
orange, and, finally, a mauve—and mauve it was—being the latest colour
combination and newer than the rest. But violet or heliotrope goes
best, to my mind, with crimson; and that is a colour combination which
came in as long ago as the early seventies, after the Franco-Prussian
war; and nothing can exceed its effectiveness if you get the right
shades for your mixture. Then heliotrope and light blue is very pretty;
but much less so than the other. The favourite mixture of this season
is, without doubt, black and white, and a very useful one it is. One
of the favourite materials for the everyday wear of the season is
alpaca, and next to that, for best gowns, comes canvas grenadines, and
a new make of crepon. Nothing can exceed the beauty of the satin-faced
foulards, which everyone seems to be ordering; and there is a great
return to spots, either placed at regular distances over the material,
or else arranged in irregularly-shaped masses. The new nun’s veilings
are also very pretty, and make delightful summer frocks for girls.

[Illustration: SOME SUMMER GOWNS.]

There is much to be said on the subject of linings, and on all sides
you will probably hear it said that no silk, or, at least, no rustling
silk linings are used now; and that all dresses are so soft and
clinging that only very soft linings are used, such as _batiste_,
which is either watered or plain, muslin, or any kind of unstiffened
material. Alpaca is lined with the same material, and not with silk,
but canvas must be silk-lined, so a new kind of foulard silk is to be
found which is non-rustling and flows in straight lines in the skirt.

Instead of a braid at the edge of your skirt, you must now use velvet,
which is to be obtained at all the shops for that purpose, and black
velvet is most used for the purpose.

The attenuation of the quite up-to-date woman is very remarkable,
and her skirts are so long and so unstiffened that they wrap round
her feet, and make her look “like a mermaid,” as one of our many
fashion-writers assures us; but, whatever the creature is that she may
be like, the effect is startling; it is so long and so unshapely when
the new style is applied to a thin figure.

[Illustration: TWO HARMONIES IN BLACK AND WHITE.]

The group of figures which I have called “Two harmonies in black
and white,” are two pretty gowns in the two hues which are the most
fashionable of all. The figure on the left holding a bird wears a gown
of white lace over black satin, which is trimmed with crescent-shaped
pieces of silk, shading from black to grey and white. These are laid
on in regular sequence of size on the skirt as well as on the bodice.
The other dress is of plainer character, and is of black, with a white
design. It is, in fact, one of the new satin-faced foulards, the
pattern being of small leaves and dots. The vest is of pleated white
satin, with revers of the same covered with lace. The bodice and
skirt are also trimmed with ruches of cream-coloured lace, which are
laid over the dress in pannier fashion, and go round the skirt at the
back. These small ruchings, made of ribbon, narrow lace, or pinked-out
silk, are quite one of the features of this season’s gowns and mantles.

[Illustration: MUSLIN FROCK FOR A YOUNG GIRL.]

The frocks for young girls are especially pretty this season, and the
use of muslin makes them always youthful-looking and light. The frock
illustrated in our sketch is made of a dotted muslin, which may be of
cream or _écru_, or even of a colour. It is lined with either a good
sateen or a silk, rose, pink, or blue being pretty colours; and the
bodice has a deep yoke of silk of the colour of the lining, which has
a ruching of lace round it, or else one of silk gauze, which is almost
equally popular. The muslin which covers the bodice is tucked, and also
that on the pointed tunic, which is edged with deep muslin frills,
having lines of narrow pink or blue ribbon on them. The sash is of
the same colour, tied at the back, the ends of which are fringed, and
trimmed with bands of a deeper shade of the same colour. This might
be made in an easier manner by tucking the skirt, as shown in the
drawing, in a pointed shape, and then putting the muslin flounce on as
a trimming to it. This frock could, of course, be copied in any other
material, such as cambric nun’s veiling or a grenadine. Pale grey
grenadine over pink or blue silk is a very fashionable gown for young
people this season.

The second figure of this group wears a black corded silk jacket, made
very short, with white revers, and cordings of white satin. It is quite
tight-fitting, and has an under vest of white satin, and a high collar
at the back. A large scarf of lace is worn with a big bow under the
chin. These last-named are donned by everyone this year, and they are
also universally becoming, and lend much softness to the face. They are
very easy to make for oneself at home, with the aid of a yard or so of
net and a little pretty lace. But beware of getting either of these
too cheap, for cheapness here would destroy the good effect; and poor
materials will not wash. The skirt worn by this figure is of pale grey,
trimmed with flat bands of silk, and made with a pointed tunic. The hat
is a very pretty one, of white chip, trimmed with black tulle, ruched.
A gold buckle and black feathers are worn with it. The edge is bound
with black velvet, and underneath the brim is a bunch of pink roses.

In the hair-dressing of the present moment there is an enormous amount
of frizzing and waving; in fact, too much of it for the symmetry of the
head, and the work of the curling-irons is all too evident. One thing
of which everyone complains is, that all heads are alike, and it is
much to be desired that more individual thought should be devoted to
the dressing of the head. The back hair is dressed in coils, winding
round and round smoothly, except when the door-knocker style is still
retained; but this form of hair-dressing is fast going out. Then the
head is covered with a mass of frizzled hair, which is too disorderly
to be beautiful, and in which the beauty of its colour is lost.

A great many women and girls have deserted the use of hot irons, and
have gone back to curl-papers, and hair-pins, to wave the hair. In
order to avoid the use of either of these, an inventive genius has
found out a way of winding a ribbon round with the hair-pin, so that,
after the hair is wound in and out on it, the hair-pin can be slipped
out, and the two ends of the ribbon which have been left out are tied
tightly together, and the hair is then held on the ribbon only. The
little bunch thus made is far less ugly than the spiky wire-fencing
made by the hairpin ends. The ribbon used is baby ribbon, of course,
and when a becoming colour is selected, the effect is quite pretty.
Silk pieces of various colours are used also, on which to curl the
hair, and in some measure do away with the ugliness of the usual
papers. I have heard lately of a young married lady who had a false
front made, to put on at night over her hair-wavers, which, she said,
were so ugly, she could not bear to look at herself in them, and so
tried this way to surmount the difficulty.

In the group of three figures called “Some Summer Gowns,” the first
figure on the right wears a light-grey gown, with trimmings of
coffee-coloured lace. The flounces are edged with the same, and the
vest has alternate stripings of grey and black. There is a draping of
white satin on the vest, which is like a sash from the side of the
bodice. There are revers of the same lace, and upstanding frilling
at the back of the neck. The sleeves are fluted in puffs, from the
shoulder to the elbow, with rows of coffee-coloured lace insertion
between them, and are finished with a pointed cuff over the hand. The
centre figure wears a blouse of _écru_ silk, the sleeves and yoke being
mitred, and a pointed epaulette at the shoulder. With this a white
muslin collar is worn. The last figure, at the extreme left, wears a
cape of white silk with a cover of black net, and ruches of black and
white satin ribbon; small black rosettes round the collar, and a ruche
of black and white lace at the neck. A white hat, bound at the edge of
the brim with a black velvet, the trimming being of black tulle, with
pale-pink roses, and brownish leaves and buds; the same flowers under
the brim at the back.

I do not think, in spite of Viscountess Harberton, that the majority of
English women desire to wear knickerbockers, nor even the divided skirt
with which her name has been so much associated in the past; and I
hear that French women of the better classes are adopting the skirt of
the English women, which they consider much more becoming. After all,
there is no need of complaint, for several English firms supply a most
ingenious skirt, which—though divided, and giving all the advantages
of that shape—when on the bicycle, falls into the usual folds of the
skirt which is not divided, and looks just the same. I must confess
that this appears to me to meet all requirements, and that the extreme
ugliness of the knickerbockers, when worn, need not make them an object
of attraction to any woman who values her appearance. There seems to
be a universal consensus of opinion that nothing can look better than
an Englishwoman in a tailor-made and carefully-fitted dress, quiet in
colour, and of the suitable length and shape of skirt. She looks one
with her machine, and has nothing flying in the way of decorations to
make her untidy.




IN THE TWILIGHT SIDE BY SIDE.

BY RUTH LAMB.


PART VIII.

SUNDAY AND REST.

    “Return unto thy rest, O my soul.”—Ps. cxvi. 7.

This evening, my dear girls, we will try to realise as far as possible
how Jesus, our one perfect pattern, spent His Sabbaths. We get glimpses
of them, here and there, in the history of His life on earth, and
because they are only glimpses they are all the more precious.

It is an astonishing fact that the events of only one complete day
of Christ’s life are recorded, and that day was the last of all, and
ended on the cross. But we know well what sort of working days Jesus
spent. Days of temptation, but no yielding, though the keenness of it
was sharpened by hunger. Days of ceaseless work and weariness, but also
of uncomplaining perseverance in doing what the Father had given Him
to do. Nights spent in secluded spots or on the mountains, in prayer,
and in communion with God, after days passed in healing, blessing,
teaching and feeding the hungry multitude. Jesus was always ready to
help all who sought His aid, or who needed it without expressing their
wants. Words were not necessary to the Son of God, Who could read the
heart-longings of His brethren according to the flesh.

Do you wish to know whether Jesus set the example of attending public
worship on the Sabbath? Here is the answer: “And He came to Nazareth,
where He had been brought up: and, as His custom was, He went into the
synagogue on the Sabbath day, and stood up for to read.” On this and on
other occasions we find Him teaching and preaching, as well as reading,
and it is certain that the presence of Jesus at public worship was no
fitful thing, but the habit of His life.

It was in the synagogue that Christ healed the man with the withered
hand, and taught the sweet lesson that acts of mercy and good doing are
lawful on all days and at all times. There, also, He loosed from her
infirmity the poor woman who had been bowed together for eighteen years
and could in no wise lift up herself.

It was on the Sabbath day that Jesus made clay, anointed the eyes of
the blind man, and sent him to wash in the pool of Siloam, whence he
returned seeing, and full of gladness.

We get other glimpses of the Sabbaths of Jesus besides these which have
shown Him in the synagogue. They were not days of gloom or unsocial
isolation. See Him walking through the cornfields on the Sabbath day
with His hungry disciples, who satisfied their craving by plucking a
few ears and rubbing them in their hands. This picture leaves a sweet
thought. Christ’s followers may even want bread, yet be blessed with a
sense of their Master’s presence and sympathy, in every time of need.

Jesus accepted an invitation to eat bread with one of the chief
Pharisees on the Sabbath day; thus we see that He did not abstain from
social intercourse on the day of rest. The Jews were most particular
in buying and preparing beforehand the best food for the Sabbath day,
in order to do it honour. An old writer, in alluding to this, says,
“The Sabbath should not be a day of austerity. The most nutritive food
should be procured, if possible, that both body and soul may feel the
influence of this Divine appointment, and give God the glory of His
grace. On this blessed day let every man eat his bread with gladness
and singleness of heart, praising God. If the Sabbath be a festival,
let it be observed unto the Lord; and let no unnecessary acts be done.”

It was whilst partaking of the chief Pharisee’s hospitality that
another suffering man came under the notice of the Great Physician, and
was healed, and sent away rejoicing on the Sabbath day. In like manner,
the impotent man, who had been thirty-eight years helpless, was bidden
to take up his bed and walk. With the command came the power to obey,
and “the same day was the Sabbath.”

What have we learned from these glimpses of Jesus on the day of
rest? Surely that it was a happy day which included attendance at
public worship, the study of the Scriptures, the teaching of them to
others, healthful outdoor exercise, indoor social intercourse, and the
acceptance of hospitality, together with the instant seizure of every
opportunity for good doing. There is no trace of gloom in connection
with the Sabbaths of Jesus. So you and I, dear ones, when in God’s
house, can say, “Coming here regularly, I follow Christ’s example.”
If teaching the little ones of the flock, “My master taught in the
synagogue. In my humble way I can pass on to those younger than myself
the lessons He gave. I can work no miracle of healing, but, if the mind
is in me that was in Christ, I can and I will make some poor sufferer’s
Sunday the brighter for my presence and my help.”

If I am walking by the way, or a guest at the table of another, my
conduct shall be in harmony with the day. I will neither act nor speak
so that I should be ashamed to think, “My Master knows the thoughts of
my heart, and has heard my words and seen my actions.”

We can do, or leave undone, many things in the home which will be
helpful to the servants. We can save them trouble without any effort
to ourselves, and thus give them a fair share of Sabbath privileges.
It is sad when servants have to say “Sunday is the hardest day of the
week to us,” yet this often happens, not because of necessary work, but
owing to the indolence and self-indulgence of the family, and the extra
labour entailed by many visitors. Believe me, only those can truly
enjoy God’s gift of a day of rest who are His servants, and who have
in them the spirit of love, which comes from Him Who “is love.” With
it they will need no written rules. They will be a law to themselves.
The Sabbath will be looked forward to with gladness as a day to be
dedicated to God and our neighbour, by worship, good doing, occupation
without toil or weariness, and happy intercourse with those we love.
We shall not say, “I can make the fields my church, and worship the
Creator in the midst of His works as well as I could under the roof of
a cathedral.” We shall love to join with those who are gathered in His
name and house, but we shall not on that account forget to praise Him
when we walk by the way and discern Him in His works. We shall be glad
to put the toils and cares of the workaday world as far out of sight
and mind as possible, that Monday may find us strong and ready to bear
the heat and burden of the six coming days.

I was once deeply touched by the words of a dear woman, a cottager’s
wife, of whom it might be said she just “knew, but knew no more, her
Bible true,” for she could read it, and that was all, and it was her
one book. How real it was to her! How she dwelt on its messages of
cheer and hope, and was gladdened as she spelled out the words of some
sweet promise! How she revelled in Sunday as a gift that only those who
toiled week in, week out, could fitly value! She would not have the
worries of the other days intruding themselves upon the hours sacred to
joy, and peace, and rest.

It happened that she and her husband had been passing through a time
of trouble and anxiety. There had been sickness in the home, and this
meant suspended work and wages, more need for money and less to meet
it. The week-end saw them in sore straits for quite a little sum,
and the thought of what might happen on the Monday, if it were not
forthcoming, troubled the mother’s mind for a moment.

“But it was Sunday,” she said, when speaking of it afterwards, “and I
wouldn’t have that spoiled. There was the rest day for us, whatever
Monday might bring, and bread for so long, anyway. Every now and then
I seemed to hear those words, ‘The Lord will provide,’ and I took the
message and put the worry right out of my mind. I had got into a way
of never asking for money or anything of that sort on Sundays, and I
didn’t on that one. I just enjoyed it in the reg’lar way with my John
and the children, and, though I did see a bit of a cloud on his face
now and then, I never pretended to notice, but smiled back, and it
went. I never slept better than I did that Sunday night.”

“And when Monday came?” I asked.

“Help came, in quite a _nateral_ sort of way, as it seemed, through
John’s old master. He said we had been on his mind all Sunday, and he’d
brought us the loan of a sovereign. We could pay it back at sixpence
a week, but there was no hurry. We must be a bit behindhand through
John’s illness. The master was always just, but he was reckoned a hard
man, and he went out of his way when he lent that sovereign. Didn’t my
heart go up to God in thankfulness that Monday morning, and wasn’t I
glad to tell my John, ‘He has provided.’”

I have always thought that this dear woman realised the privileges and
preciousness of the Sabbath in a greater degree than anyone else I ever
knew.

Let us cull a thought or two from the utterances of George Herbert,
the country parson, who was, in 1630, inducted into the parsonage of
Pemberton, and who has been called the “Keble of the age which boasted
of Shakespeare, Bacon, Spenser, and Ben Jonson.” I could wish that his
life (written by Izaak Walton) and his works, in prose and poetry, were
in every girl’s bookcase. It is passing from the unlettered peasant
woman to the cultured divine, but the quotations I will give you
show how the same spirit actuates high and low, the ignorant and the
learned, when, as the children of God, they express their sense of the
infinite preciousness of the Sabbath. Herbert’s poem called “Sunday”
is too long to quote as a whole, but you will enjoy reading some
quotations from it.

            “O day most calm, most bright!
    The fruit of this, the next world’s bud,
    Th’ endorsement of supreme delight,
    Writ by a Friend, and with His blood;
    The couch of time; care’s balm and bay,
    The week were dark, but for thy light,
            Thy torch doth show the way.

           *       *       *       *       *

            Sundays the pillars are,
    On which Heaven’s palace archèd lies;
    The other days fill up the spare
    And hollow room with vanities.
    They are the fruitful beds and borders
    In God’s rich garden; that is bare
            Which parts their ranks and orders.”

In alluding to the change from the seventh to the first day of the
week, now observed as the Christian’s Sunday, the poet uses very
beautiful and expressive imagery to account for the alteration.

            “The brightness of that day
    We sullied by our foul offence,
    Wherefore that robe we cast away,
    Having a new at His expense,
    Whose drops of blood paid the full price
    That was required to make us gay,
            And fit for paradise.

           *       *       *       *       *

            Thou art a day of mirth,
    And where the weekdays trail on ground,
    Thy flight is higher, as thy birth.”

It is related that, on the Sunday before his death, Mr. Herbert rose
suddenly from his bed, called for one of his instruments, and, having
tuned it, sang the following verse from the same poem.

            “The Sundays of man’s life,
    Threaded together on Time’s string,
    Make bracelets to adorn the wife[2]
    Of the eternal, glorious King.
    On Sunday Heaven’s gate stands ope’.
    Blessings are plentiful and ripe,
            More plentiful than hope.”

Our poet-pastor was no gloomy ascetic. He revelled, so to speak, in
this good gift of God, and sang His praises with a joyful heart.
Whilst picturing all the varied aspects of the country parson’s life,
and noting its sad experiences, he gives us a picture of him “In
mirth.” “As knowing that nature will not bear everlasting droppings,
and that pleasantness of disposition is a great key to do good;” and
“Instructions seasoned with pleasantness both enter sooner and root
deeper. Wherefore he condescends to human frailties, both in himself
and others, and intermingles some mirth in his discourses occasionally,
according to the pulse of the hearer.” Other duties ended, “At night
he thinks it a very fit time, suitable to the joy of the day, either
to entertain some of his neighbours or be entertained by them, and to
discourse of things profitable and pleasant. As he opened the day with
prayer, so he closeth it, humbly beseeching the Almighty to pardon and
accept our poor services and to improve them, that we may grow therein,
and that our feet may be like hinds’ feet, ever climbing up higher and
higher unto Him.”

I feel sure, my dear girls, that in giving you these beautiful pictures
of Sabbath joy, I have done you a real service. I have never forgotten
either the words of my village friend or the effect produced on me by
the first reading of the country parson’s “Sunday.” Both reflected the
mind of the Master they served, and to-day their example and words are
well worthy of our imitation.

Thus far I have said little about “Rest,” except in connection with
the “Day of Rest.” It is delightful to note that from the very
beginning there was a Divine recognition of the need for rest, and
that the Creator’s plan for bestowing the blessing was so wide in
its application. It was ordained for man in the first instance, then
extended to the animals that had been subdued to service under him,
and, later still, to the land. Long before the children of Israel had
ended their wanderings in the desert, the command was given to them by
Moses, “When ye come into the land which I give you, then shall the
land keep a Sabbath unto the Lord.” “In the seventh year shall be a
Sabbath of rest unto the land.”

The Israelites, who had been for so many generations the bondsmen
of Egypt, and then for forty years wanderers in the desert, had to
be divinely taught what pertained to a settled mode of life. As
landowners, they had to learn that each crop yielded takes something
out of the ground, and that it must have a period of rest, or its power
of production will be exhausted. Hence the Sabbath for the land. In
our time the chemist has taught the farmer that by putting certain
substances into the ground, he can restore what the crop has taken from
it; but in times within my own memory the remedy was to let the land
lie fallow—that is, at rest for a year before it was sown again.

What a delightful word “rest” is! It has so many meanings in everyday
use, and in the Bible also; and all of them are suggestive of benefit
and good to soul, mind, and body. Glance for instance at Psalm cxvi.,
and you will find a picture of one who had “found trouble and sorrow,”
and been full of fears and anxieties; but he had gone with crying and
prayers to God, who heard and answered. So, bursting into a hymn of
gratitude and triumph, he exclaims—

“I love the Lord, because He hath heard my voice and my supplications.
I was brought low, and He helped me. Return unto thy rest, O my soul;
for the Lord hath dealt bountifully with thee.”

Here, my dear ones, you see that rest means the calm confidence in God
which brings the soul a peace which passeth all understanding. This
is the rest which Jesus linked with those sweetly familiar words of
invitation so often quoted: “Come unto Me, all ye that labour and are
heavy laden, and I will give you rest. Take My yoke upon you, and
learn of Me; for I am meek and lowly in heart; and ye shall find rest
unto your souls.”

This rest means “peace with God through our Lord Jesus Christ,” which
those who love and trust in Him enjoy even in this troublesome world.
With this soul restfulness all the trials of life lose much of their
keenness; without it they pierce more deeply and are doubly hard to
bear. Yet there are so many worries and anxieties in daily life to give
us unquiet minds. Even when our own paths are fairly smooth, we often
have uneasy minds and sleepless nights on account of those we love, or
we are harassed by mental visions of coming evil, till we are ready to
cry, as David did, “O that I had wings like a dove! for then would I
flee away and be at rest.”

A little later, in the same Psalm, comes the remedy: “Cast thy burden
upon the Lord, and He shall sustain thee.”

From Psalmist, Apostle, and, better than all, from the lips of Jesus
Himself, we receive unfailing guidance to the one source of rest, both
for troubled souls and disquieted minds. When all the world fails us,
let us, my dear ones, try to remember that He is faithful Who promised,
“I will give you rest.”

Then there are these poor frail bodies of ours that have to bear
weariness and the pain which makes the rest they cry out for
impossible. How many of us have felt our utter helplessness at the
sight of suffering which we could not relieve, though we would gladly
have borne it for a while in order to purchase an interval of rest for
one we loved?

One of you, who asked that the subject of “Rest” might be considered
at a Twilight gathering, told me that she was an invalid, crippled
with sciatica and muscular rheumatism, only able to move from place
to place by means of a wheeled chair, seldom free from pain, and
sleeping but little. Yet she was able to show me that her mind was
active in planning for the good of others, and that her thoughts shaped
themselves into songs of thankfulness and longings for a more complete
submission to God’s will. So, as I read, I said to myself, “Thank God
for this record! Though it tells of pain, it also tells of patience.
The body suffers, and the burden is a heavy one; but it is borne by
means of God-given strength, and ‘There is a rest that remaineth’ for
His people.”

When this world, with its sorrow, suffering, trouble, and weariness,
shall have passed away they shall find eternal rest in the Father’s
home above. “And God shall wipe away all tears from their faces, and
there shall be no more death, neither sorrow nor crying, neither shall
there be any more pain.”

    “Rest comes at length; though life be long and dreary,
      The day must dawn, and darksome night be past;
    Faith’s journey ends in welcome to the weary,
      And Heaven, the heart’s true home, will come at last.”

(_To be continued._)

FOOTNOTES:

[2] See Rev. xxi. 2, 9.




SHEILA.

BY EVELYN EVERETT-GREEN, Author of “Greyfriars,” “Half-a-dozen
Sisters,” etc.


CHAPTER VIII.

MONCKTON MANOR.

“They ought to have asked me too,” said Effie, looking rather black. “I
call it quite rude; but these grand county people always are so rude.”

“Oh, but, Effie, I am only going to practise accompaniments! I go to
River Street for that, and you don’t mind. Why should you mind this? We
never can get those difficult passages right without a proper, long,
steady practice, and one can’t get it at the hall. Everybody is wanting
their turn; and I get flurried with so much chattering and noise. I
thought it such a good idea when Miss Lawrence asked me to come to the
Manor.”

“She should have asked me too, then,” said Effie, with a pout. “Not
that I care about going. I’m not such a great admirer of May Lawrence
or her voice; it’s too low and gruff for me.”

“Oh, not gruff; it’s a beautiful, rich contralto. It’s quite a pleasure
to hear her.”

“Oh, you think so because she likes your playing, and butters you up!
But, anyhow, I don’t think much of it, and I do say she ought to have
asked me too.”

“People know you are delicate; they don’t like to bother you to take
long drives,” suggested Sheila pacifically; but Effie was cross and
would not be amiable, though she ceased to make complaints about not
being asked with Sheila to the Manor.

“How are you going?”

“I thought I would ride Shamrock. Then I should be quite independent.
Cyril is going there for a day’s fishing, and he can bring me back.”

Again Effie’s face darkened. She did not say anything this time, but
she had a feeling as though Sheila was cutting her out of everything.
She was keenly alive to the fact that, though Cyril’s visits were
paid more frequently now, it was Sheila who engrossed the bulk of his
notice. Effie, with all her tendency to selfishness, fostered by her
mode of life, had not naturally an ignoble disposition, and her ideals
were high. She fought rather hard against the tide of rising jealousy,
and had never betrayed it either to Sheila or to her mother; but the
pain of seeing another preferred to herself rankled rather keenly; and
during these past days—indeed for a week or two now—it had been hard
work to keep down the unworthy feeling.

All the young people of Isingford were keenly excited about the
forthcoming effort which was to extinguish the debt upon the two
churches. All were eager to help, and Effie herself had been roused to
desire to do something. She had practised with new energy, so as to
be able to take part in the concert of local talent, and her song was
already selected and placed in the programme. But she did not think
anybody showed any enthusiasm over her performance. Perhaps her voice
had deteriorated somewhat, though nobody said so. She was listened
to quite kindly, and her friends said her song would be certain to
“go down”; but that was all. Whereas, over May Lawrence’s performance
there was a little furore, and she was entreated to sing twice, and
was called quite openly the _prima donna_. Effie had not expected that
title for herself, yet she was not quite pleased by the treatment she
received.

And then Sheila was in such request. Sheila was so popular. It was
quickly discovered that, though no very brilliant performer on the
piano as a soloist, she had a very pretty gift for accompanying. Her
touch was soft and sympathetic; she never played wrong notes, even
if she missed the right ones. It became quite the usual thing for
the soloists to beg her to play for them, and, as she was delighted
to please and very fond of this sort of work, she soon became the
acknowledged accompanist of the concert, and a person in great demand.

May Lawrence was one of those who had taken a great fancy to her, and
this invitation to Monckton Manor, a place Effie had only seen once
upon a formal call, was rather galling to her.

Sheila started out a little depressed in spirits, for she disliked the
feeling that Effie was “cross with her.” She was sensitive, like all
young things, to the disapproval of those about her, and thought it
very hard to be blamed when she had really done no harm. Sheila was
for the first time tasting a little of the discipline of life, and
she did not enjoy the experience. She wanted it always to be sunshine
about her. She liked to be petted and caressed. She was ready to love
everybody, if they would only love her. It seemed to her very hard when
she was criticised for something that was not the least wrong. It had
never been so in old days, and why should it be now?

However, upon her arrival at the Manor House all troubled thoughts were
quickly dissipated by the warm reception she met with. May Lawrence
met her with a kiss. The two girls fell into Christian names almost
at once. The pleasant old semi-Tudor house was delightful to Sheila,
reminding her in many ways of her own home. Mrs. Lawrence welcomed her
kindly, saying she had heard a great deal about her and her pretty
playing, and May took her into the orchard-house and regaled her with
delicious peaches before they did a note of practising.

“And we have such a nice visitor here now, Sheila,” she explained, “an
old friend of mother’s, though she is not really old—Miss Adene; only
she makes me call her Cousin Mary. She had a very lovely voice when
she was young, and it’s quite pretty still, though she laughs when I
tell her so. She has given me a lot of hints about my songs. She sings
little bits to show me how to do it. She must have been splendidly
taught herself! Let’s come to the music-room! Perhaps she will come and
listen.”

Sheila followed her willingly, and on their way to the house May
exclaimed, “Oh, there she is!” and the next minute Sheila was shaking
hands with Miss Adene.

Somehow Sheila’s heart went out at once to this stranger lady. She
could not say how it was, but she felt at home with her almost
immediately; and Miss Adene seemed to take a liking for the big-eyed,
soft-voiced Sheila. She asked her questions about herself, gave her
hints about her playing, and was altogether so friendly and kindly that
Sheila felt almost more at home in this house after two hours than she
had done at Cossart Place after two months.

Cyril appeared at luncheon in company with some of the Lawrence sons.
They had known each other at Cambridge, and saw a fair amount of one
another in the vacation. May was the only daughter; but she had several
brothers, and was good at most games herself, and would have liked to
play tennis with Sheila, only that her habit was rather against any
such plan.

“But you must come another day—you must come often. I have so few
girl-friends here. There are not many houses where mother cares for me
to be intimate. But I should like to have you for a friend! I hope you
will come often!”

“I should like to,” said Sheila eagerly, “but I don’t know if I can.
There is Effie! I am supposed to be her companion. I could not leave
her very often.”

“I don’t see why not,” said May, with some of the frank and unconscious
selfishness of the present-day girl. “You’re not her nurse or her white
slave, I suppose?”

Sheila laughed and blushed, and Miss Adene came unexpectedly to her
assistance.

“One need not be a nurse or a white slave, and yet one may have
duties and little kindly offices to fulfil. The happy people in this
world, May, are those who do their duty from a sense of love, and not
compulsion; and we idle people must not tempt them away from the place
where they are wanted.”

Sheila looked up with a heightened colour to say—

“I’m afraid I don’t always love my duties. Sometimes they seem very
tiresome. And I’m sure you’re not an idle person, Miss Adene; but I am
very often. Sometimes I think I’m no real good to anybody.”

“Then you must make yourself some good, dear; though I do not think
that any of us can quite help being of some service to our friends
and fellow-creatures. You have a delicate cousin to cheer up and help
back to health and strength; and you must do your best to be kind and
patient. And you will soon find how much pleasure there is in such a
task, and gain yourself a sister, since you say you have never had one
of your own.”

Sheila’s day at the Manor was a very happy one, and she particularly
enjoyed her bits of talk with Miss Adene, who promised to help at the
bazaar and, if needed, to give some assistance at the glee club, where
extra voices were wanted with a view to the coming concert.

May and one of her brothers rode part of the way back with Sheila and
Cyril, the girls in front, the young men behind.

“Do you like your cousin Cyril?” asked May with the freedom only
possible between quite young people.

“Yes, rather,” answered Sheila. “I liked him very much at first. He
seemed more like the people I had been used to, but I think I get
rather tired of him. Do you like him?”

“Not very much,” answered candid May. “The boys get on pretty well with
him; but they call him rather a bounder all the same.”

“What’s that?” asked Sheila, laughing.

“Well, I’m not quite sure if I know; but it’s not a thing he’d like to
be called. What the boys mean about him is that he’s half ashamed of
his own family, and the way in which his father has made his money,
and that’s always awfully snobbish. Why, to my thinking, the other
brother, North, is much more a true gentleman. I despise people who are
ashamed of their origin. It is nice to be a landed proprietor and a
country gentleman, of course; but there’s no disgrace in honest trade.
Why, three of our boys have had to go into business in some of its
forms; but do you think they’d be ashamed of it, or that we should be
ashamed of them? I should despise myself for ever if I were!”

“Yes, I suppose he is rather ashamed of the works,” said Sheila slowly.
“He never would have anything to do with them. I don’t quite know
what he does want for himself. Sometimes he talks about the Bar, and
sometimes the Church, and sometimes he thinks he’ll take up literature.
I suppose he’s clever.”

“The boys don’t think so; he only got a pass, you know. And I don’t
think I like men to take to the Church just for a profession. I’ve
got a brother a clergyman; but I know how he felt about it before he
took Orders. He used sometimes to talk to me. He felt that he had been
called; that is a very different thing from choosing for yourself, and
shilly-shallying as Cyril is doing.”

Sheila began to see that May, although not much older than herself,
thought things out more deeply than she had ever done.

“The boys have always talked to me, you know,” she said, “and Arnold
in particular. He is the clergyman, you know. That made one think.
It would be nicer to believe in everybody; but perhaps it’s better
sometimes to see below the surface. Sometimes I wish almost that
something would happen just to try the metal we and our friends are
made of. In olden times, when there were wars and dangers, it must have
been so much easier to know what they were like; but nothing ever does
happen in the nineteenth century—not in that sort of way.”

Nevertheless, a good deal was happening in other ways, and the
excitement increased as the time for the bazaar arrived.

The town hall was a spacious building, and it was decorated in an
effective fashion with festoons of greenery and paper and tinsel
flowers. Some people called it trumpery stuff; but it looked well, and
was cheap, and to keep down expenses was one of the chief aims of the
assistants.

The bazaar was held in the great hall; but there were two smaller
rooms, off-shoots from this, reached by short wide flights of steps,
and in these rooms the supplementary entertainments were to be held.

One was a museum of curiosities and beautiful things lent, for
which extra admission was charged; the other was given over to
entertainments. On the first day there was to be a phonograph and some
experiments with electrical apparatus, in which Oscar was to assist. On
the second the concert, and on the third some tableaux.

The whole town was in excitement over the affair, and upon the first
day the thoroughfares were quite crowded with carriages and foot
passengers. Everything went off beautifully. A great deal was sold; the
refreshments were excellent, the band good; and the people went away
declaring they should come again upon the morrow, which accordingly
they did.

The concert was almost the most exciting experience for Sheila—she had
so much accompanying to do; but she soon lost her first feeling of
nervousness, and forgot everything in the effort to help everything to
go well.

It was all a great success. Effie sang her song very creditably,
and got an encore; though some people did say it was her father who
so stubbornly led the rounds of applause. May’s singing delighted
everybody, and the glees went beautifully; Miss Adene was there,
kindly and encouraging, giving steadiness to any wavering part by her
clear rounded tones, and taking the greatest interest in everything.

Indeed, all the Monckton Manor party had come in force; and they were
to appear also upon the next day, for May had a part in several of
the tableaux, and two of the brothers also, and they were both very
clever and helpful as scene shifters. For everything was done as far as
possible by volunteers, and there was no professional aid which could
possibly be dispensed with.

The third day was in some sort the grandest, for, though the things
from the bazaar were mostly sold off, there was great interest over
the tableaux; and there was to be a troop of performing dogs in the
great hall for the young folks, since the upper room would not hold
everybody, and all must be entertained. Also the tea was to be on a
grander scale; and the hall was early thronged with eager buyers and
spectators.

There was nothing, perhaps, very original in the tableaux, but they
were very prettily got up, and it was interesting to the spectators
because they knew the actors in them.

One of the most effective ones was the presentation of the French
ambassadors at Queen Elizabeth’s court after the massacre of St.
Bartholomew. Effie was the sharp-featured Queen in sable robes, and the
stage was crowded by her black-robed courtiers and ladies-in-waiting;
whilst Oscar, Cyril, Fred Monckton, and a few more, in their gorgeous
frippery, stood evidently taken aback and confounded by the unwonted
sight of this evidence of stern woe and regal horror and offence.

The applause for this picture was loud and long, and the curtain was
just rising again when in the hush that had succeeded the clamour there
penetrated a sound of noise and confusion from the hall below, and then
the clear terrible cry:

“Fire! Fire!”

(_To be continued._)




OUR PUZZLE POEM REPORT: AN ACCIDENTAL CYCLE II.


SOLUTION.

AN ACCIDENTAL CYCLE II.


3. _When Bathing._

    Should a great wave of the sea
      Wash you away from the sands,
      At the back of your head clasp your hands,
    Remaining as still as may be:
      You may then with serenity float
      Until some one arrives with a boat.


4. _Earthquakes._

    If you should hear an earthquake’s boom,
    And see great tumult in your room,
    Fly to the door and open wide,
    And stand beneath, whate’er betide:
    For, though the house be badly rent,
    You there may safely rest content.


PRIZE WINNERS.

_Ten Shillings Each._

Rebecca Clarke, 130, Newland Street West, Lincoln.

Alison H. Halden, 13, Duke Street, Edinburgh.

Margaret S. Hall, 13, Roseneath Terrace, Edinburgh.

Carlina V. M. Leggett, Burgh Hall, Burgh, Lincolnshire.

Florence Lush, 26, Scotland Street, Edinburgh.

Mrs. Mason, 30, Cambridge Street, Great Horton, Bradford.

Robina Potts, Aln Lodge, Blacket Avenue, Edinburgh.

Isabel Snell, 51, Mere Street, Leicester.

Helen B. Younger, 5, Comiston Gardens, Edinburgh.


_Seven Shillings Each._

Rev. J. Chambers, Woodhead Vicarage, Manchester.

E. M. Dickson, 2, Bank Parade, Preston.


_Very Highly Commended._

Eliza Acworth, Annie A. Arnott, Frances A. Baker, Rose S. Bracey,
Louie Bull, Kate Campsall, Amy T. Child, Agnes Dewhurst, Katie Doyle,
Margaret A. Fisk, E. J. Friend, Caroline Gundry, Mrs. Jenks, Agnes
McConnell, Marie McQueen, Susan F. Manderson, Mrs. E. J. May, Isobel S.
Neill, E. A. O’Donoghue, Charles Parr, Nina E. Purvey, Annie Roberson,
S. A. Sanderson, Violet Shoberl, Helen Singleton, Mrs. G. W. Smith, R.
Majorie Thomas, Eva Waites, Florence Whitlock, Mrs. Wilson, Mrs. A. J.
Wilson, Emily M. P. Wood, Agnes M. Vincent.


_Highly Commended._

May Adamson, “Annis,” Edith Ashworth, Alice M. Cooper, M. A. C. Crabb,
Edith E. Grundy, Percy H. Home, E. Marian Jupe, Eliza Learmount, John
Lush, John Marshall, E. Mastin, Edith A. Newbould, Kate Robinson,
Mildred M. Skrine, Frederick W. Southey, Chas. Stephens, Constance
Taylor, C. E. Thurgar, Elizabeth Yarwood.


_Honourable Mention._

Maud Abbott, Mrs. Acheson, Eva M. Allport, Agnes Amis, Mary S. Arnold,
Rev. S. Bell, S. Ballard, Lily Belling, Isabel Borrow, Margaret E.
Bourne, Nellie D. Bourne, Edith Burfield, E. Burrell, R. E. M. Button,
A. C. Carter, Muriel L. Clague, Dora Clarke, J. Ethel Collingham,
Maggie Coombes, Rev. Joseph Corkey, R. Swan Coulthard, E. Vivian
Davies, Mrs. Frank Dickson, Rev. F. Dobbin, Jessie F. Dulley, Winefride
Ellison, Eleanor Elsey, A. and F. Fooks, F. Fuller, Annie M. Goss,
A. Grainger, Ellie Hanlon, Bessie Hine, Carrie Hine, Gertrude Hire,
Ethel W. Hodgkinson, L. Holt, Edith C. Hoon, Arthur W. Howse, Annie
M. Hutchens, Lizzie M. Iggulden, “Iseult,” Margaret Jaques, Alice E.
Johnson, Edith B. Jowett, A. Kilburn, Clara E. Law, Fred Lindley, E.
E. Lockyear, Gertrude Longbottom, Jennie M. McCall, Ethel C. McMaster,
M. G. Mill, F. Miller, J. D. Musgrave, Jessie Neighbour, Rev. V. Odom,
G. de Courcy Peach, Ernest Plater, Hannah E. Powell, A. O. Prentice,
Ellen M. Price, Lucy Richardson, Katherine M. Scott, Ellen Shattock, A.
A. L. Shave, A. C. Sharp, Mrs. Sherring, Wm. Dunford-Smith, Norah M.
Sullivan, G. Swaine, G. Thomas, Ellen Thurtell, Wm. J. Trim, May Tutte,
Mary F. Wakelin, Mabel Wearing, Frances H. Webb-Gillman, Gertrude West,
Eleanor Whitcher, Mrs. E. A. Wilson, Adelaide Wright, Edith M. Younge.


EXAMINERS’ REPORT.

Nearly nine hundred competitors tried their skill upon this puzzle, and
with such good effect that our award is long enough to excite editorial
remonstrance. To make room for it we must cut down our report to the
verge of terseness.

Many solvers left out the “An” in the heading. In a way it was only a
trifling error, but as it could only be attributed to carelessness,
it did not commend itself to our sympathy. It was less wonderful that
the unwonted exercise of the hen in the first title was not correctly
interpreted by all. Let us say at once that the excited fowl was not
“drowning” nor “in danger of drowning;” the water was too shallow.
“When in water” was not quite explicit enough either as a title or as
an interpretation of the picture. The hen was in a bath, and therefore
presumably _bathing_.

In the first line we often found “big” and “large” instead of _great_.
It is more customary to speak of big and great waves than of large
waves, and we gave slight preference to the former readings.

In the title of the second puzzle a few solvers failed to notice the
s and wrote “An earthquake.” It was a pity. Likewise in the first
line the s was sometimes missing, and more often the apostrophe. But
it was in the fourth line that the real trouble was found. Was the h
_under_ the w, or was it _inside_ or was it _outside_? Opinions widely
differed, but the majority voted it to be _beneath_, appreciating the
sense of the advice in spite of poetic obscurity of expression.

While we were wrestling with the point a learned professor came into
our room. We read the lines to him, and asked what impression they
conveyed to his mind. Without an instant’s hesitation he threw open the
door and stood beneath the lintel, and we returned to our work with
much comfort and increased admiration for learned professors.

The advice may seem to be strange to those unacquainted with
earthquakes and their ways, but it is based upon wide experience.
However great the “tumult,” the framework of the doorway generally
affords ample protection.

In the same line “whatere” was sometimes erroneously substituted for
_whate’er_. Here we must call attention to the fact that whatever is
one word, and that the contraction is one word also.

In very many solutions _tho’_ appeared in place of “though.” On
this point one competitor very clearly puts the correct ruling.
He writes—“‘Tho’’ for ‘though’ phonetically (as ‘ma’ for ‘may’ in
line following). ‘Tho’’ is not admissible, nor any shortenings
by an apostrophe of the spelling of a word where, abbreviated or
unabbreviated, the pronunciation remains the same.”

In writing, these abbreviations are sometimes used, but they indicate a
lack of refinement in style, and are much to be deprecated.

It only remains for us to say that absolute perfection was attained by
the first prize-winners, and by no one else. As to the mention lists,
those solvers who took the trouble to indent the lines of the first
verse, as in the published solution, will find their names in a higher
class than those who did not. The rhyming lines of the second puzzle
run in pairs, hence no grouping by indentation was necessary.

An expert and critical solver has written a letter about the puzzle,
“An Ideal Garden,” which deserves attention. He first contends that
he “sent in a perfectly correct solution,” but we have been able
to set his mind at rest on that point by returning it to him. He
next maintains that in punctuation “the printed solution is wrong.”
According to him the first line should read “A garden, like a room,
should be,” and not “A garden like a room should be,”.

But it all depends upon the meaning of the lines. In our version it is
that a garden should be like a room, it should have a green carpet, and
for furniture, a few trees.

In our correspondent’s version the sense is altogether different.
It is that a garden should have a green carpet like a room, and we
feel inclined to apply to it Euclid’s most popular utterance. And yet
indifferent as the reading is, we let it pass, for as we have before
remarked, we only take punctuation into account when it is absolutely
wrong.

Again, our critic complains of the absence of commas in line 4, which
should, in his opinion, read—“And on it, here and there, a tree.” Here
we prefer the amended version to that printed, but it is entirely a
question of taste and not of accuracy. He further asserts that the
note of exclamation can correctly follow either the interjection or
“happiness” in line 10. So it can, and our only crime is that we did
not print it in both places. Finally he complains that while his
solution was not mentioned, some solutions which owed their perfection
to his help were more fortunate. The information is no surprise to us,
for we have often traced our correspondent’s hand in solutions under
another name. He says—“I suppose this is allowable.” It is allowable
inasmuch as we have no rule forbidding it, but we do not think that
help ought to be asked from a rival competitor. It does not accord with
our notions of strict fairness, and a less generously-minded solver
would not place his ingenuity at the disposal of his friends.

And this is the way in which we cut down a report!


CONSOLATION PRIZE 1897-8.

The highest number of marks, in accordance with the conditions laid
down, was obtained by Mrs. J. Champneys, Croft House, Winchester, to
whom one guinea has been sent.


FOREIGN AWARDS.

A WELL-BRED GIRL (No. 2).


_Prize Winners (Half-a-Guinea Each)._

Amy and Ethel Beven, Rose Cottage, Kandy, Ceylon.

Miss L. Gamlen, École Normale d’Institutrices, La Rochelle, Charente
Inferiéure, France.


_Very Highly Commended._

Elsie V. Davies (Australia), Elizabeth M. Lang (France), Helen
Shilstone (Barbados).


_Highly Commended._

Louis E. Blazé (Ceylon), Nellie M. Daft (Portugal), Frank, Hugh, and
Robert Glass (India), Polly Lawrance (Barbados), Mrs. Hastings Ogilvie,
Mrs. G. Marrett (India), Winifred Bizzey (Canada).


_Honourable Mention._

Grace Carmichael, Fontilla Greaves (Barbados), Harriet Kettle
(France), M. R. Laurie (Barbados), M. E. Lewis (Hungary), Alice J.
Moffitt (Switzerland), Gladys D. G. Peacock (France), Anne G. Taylor
(Australia), Herbert Traill (India).




ANSWERS TO CORRESPONDENTS.


MISCELLANEOUS.

MABEL.—The term _molto agitato_ means with much emotional feeling.
_Allegro_ means quick and lively, but not as fast as _presto_.
_Allegro con brio_ means in brilliant style, and _caratteristico_,
characteristic of the nature of the subject.

H. L. W.—Sidmouth lies in a valley between the Salcombe and Peak hills,
which are each about 500 feet in height, and is built on the shore of
a bay extending from Portland to Start Point. The bathing is good in
summer, and provisions cheap. The climate is mild and well suited to
invalids, and there is generally a fine breeze from the sea, and less
rain than in most places on the Devonshire coast. Altogether we should
regard it as a very suitable holiday resort at Easter. A great many
pleasant excursions may be made in the near neighbourhood.

ULRICA (The Hague).—The grey parrot, or “jaco,” of Guinea, and other
hot parts of Africa, takes a foremost place amongst the various species
of its family for intelligence, docility, and healthfulness. Perfect
cleanliness is essential for them. The perches should be thick and
smooth, and so should be also the ring suspended from the top of the
cage where they swing and roost. Their food consists of any kind of
seed, grain, and nuts, bread and milk, and Indian corn well boiled and
given cold. They also have a little ripe fruit, a bit of sugar, plenty
of clean water, and the food trays should be of crockery or porcelain,
or of thick glass—not tin nor zinc. Clean gravel is necessary. Give no
meat nor pastry.

ELSIE.—In the upper ranks of society the rule is for the lady to retain
her seat when a gentleman bows or offers his hand. Of course, there may
be exceptions in the case of a little girl in her “teens” and an aged
man.

RETHA.—It is very grievous that you should have engaged yourself to
marry a man whom you did not love with more than a feeling of ordinary
friendship. But it would be the less of two evils to confess your state
of feeling, rather than to allow him to marry a woman who felt so cool
towards him. Do not deceive him, however humiliating your own position.
Better that he should suffer the disappointment before the irrevocable
step is taken, which must result in a life-long regret.

A. H. P.—Your writing is so illegible we can scarcely decipher the
names about which you inquire. Pronounce as Mar-ca-sis, Hal-lay,
Jo-a-kim, Mas-con-ye, Tcha-e-kofs-key. In Russ and Polish the “w” is
pronounced as our “f.”

WILD ROSE (Broisla).—A _centimetre_ is 0.39371 of an inch. This
correspondent wishes to correspond with an English and an Italian girl,
so as to improve herself in their respective languages.

OPHELIA.—To make meringues, whip the whites of six eggs till very firm;
mix three-quarters of a pound of the finest icing sugar with them.
Fill a tablespoon with the mixture as quickly as possible, and put on
a strip of white paper placed on a baking board. Repeat this process
rapidly till all the meringues be made, and sift fine sugar over them;
then, without loss of time, place them in the oven, the heat of which
should only be sufficient to dry them, and brown them very slightly.
When firm, remove them from the papers, and with great care scoop out
from the inside as much as you can without injuring the case. Then
place them on fresh strips of paper, the hollow side uppermost, and
let them remain in the same moderate heat till perfectly crisp. When
cold, fill one case with whipped cream, place another over it, and if
necessary to keep it in position, use a very little white of egg. If to
be flavoured with vanilla, it should be added before commencing to whip
the whites of eggs; thirty drops of the extract would probably suffice.
The filling with thick cream should not be done until just before
serving as the moisture might dissolve them.

M. HOWARD.—The name “Chloe” is pronounced Klo-e, and “Lois” as Lo-iss.

MISERABLE.—You had better give up all thought of marrying. You are not
likely to make any man happy. If you marry at all, it should be the man
you have so dishonourably jilted. He might go to law, and oblige you to
pay for your breach of promise.

SNOWDROP.—We give you a recipe for sponge-cake from the first
authority. Stand a large bowl in a _bain-marie_ of hot water. Put in
one pound of powdered sugar, break twelve eggs into the bowl, whisk
quickly; remove the bowl from the _bain_, and continue whisking till
quite cold. Sift in one pound of flour, add the chopped rind of a
lemon, mix with a wooden spoon. Butter a mould or baking dish, and put
in a sprinkling of flour, knocking out all that does not adhere to the
butter; pour in the mixture, and place it in a moderate oven for about
an hour, and when done it will feel firm to the touch. Perhaps the best
plan for ascertaining the state of the cake is to run a slight wooden
skewer into the centre. If insufficiently baked some of the mixture
will adhere to the skewer; if done, it will come out clean. When ready
for use, turn the cake out on a sieve to cool. Whatever recipes you
have hitherto tried that failed, we doubt any disappointment in the
present case.




OUR NEW PUZZLE POEM.


[Illustration]

⁂ PRIZES to the amount of six guineas (one of which will be reserved
for competitors living abroad) are offered for the best solutions of
the above Puzzle Poem. The following conditions must be observed:—

1. Solutions to be written on one side of the paper only.

2. Each paper to be headed with the name and address of the competitor.

3. Attention must be paid to spelling, punctuation, and neatness.

4. Send by post to Editor, GIRL’S OWN PAPER, 56, Paternoster Row,
London. “Puzzle Poem” to be written on the top left-hand corner of the
envelope.

5. The last day for receiving solutions from Great Britain and Ireland
will be July 17, 1899; from Abroad, September 16, 1899.

The competition is open to all without any restrictions as to sex or
age.




OUR SUPPLEMENT STORY COMPETITION.

ONLY A SHOP-GIRL: A STORY IN MINIATURE.


FIRST PRIZE (£2 2s.).

May Shawyer, Penrith.


SECOND PRIZE (£1 1s.).

Mabel Gibson, Wandsworth Common, S.W.


THIRD PRIZE (10s. 6d.).

Lucy Bourne, Winchester.


_Honourable Mention._

Rose Cooke, Lowestoft; Lily Chamberlain, Forest Hill, S.E.; Letitia
E. May, Alton, Hants.; Kate Betts, Kemp Town, Brighton; Mabel Jenks,
Cambridge; Kate Nora Norris, Stoke Newington; Elsie Olver, Brockley;
Bessie Hine, South Tottenham; Jane Bailey German, West Bromwich; Ethel
G. Goulden, Finsbury Park Road, N.; Jessie Elizabeth Jackson, Beverley;
Relda Hofman, Fontenay-sous-Bois, France; Maggie Bisset, Aberdeen; W.
Bruin, Greenwich; Jessie Middlemiss, Ripon; Laura Johnson, Richmond,
S.W.; Edith Alice Hague, Stockport; “Little Nell,” Lincs.; Violet C.
Todd, Cornhill-on-Tweed; Winifred Botterill, Driffield, East Yorks;
Mabel Moscrop, Saltburn-by-Sea; Margaret W. Rudd, Anerley; Jessie H.
Hughes, Croydon; May Adele Venn, West Kensington Park, W.; Gertrude
Borrow, Goldhurst Terrace, N.W.; Jessie Aitchison, Wandsworth, S.W.

    ⁂ The publication of the Supplement Stories is in abeyance at
    present in order to afford our readers an opportunity of acquiring
    those stories already issued. The first story, “A Cluster of
    Roses,” by Sarah Doudney, is now in its third edition, and is
    published at 3d., and in cloth 6d.




SUNDROPS,[3]

Our Extra Summer Number, is now published (price 6d.), and our readers
must order it at once from their booksellers, if they wish to possess a
copy, as the Number cannot be reprinted.


CONTENTS.

_Frontispiece: Sweet Summer Eve._

  =Ivy.= A Short Story. By the Lady DUNBOYNE, Author of “The Three Old
      Maids of Leigh,” etc.

  =Offers of Marriage.= By ISABELLA FYVIE MAYO.

  =On Perfection of Position for Girl Cyclists.= Fully Illustrated. By
      Mrs. EGBERT A. NORTON.

  =In the Red Days of the Terror.= A Story in Four Chapters. By MARIA
      A. HOYER, Author of “A Trick for a Trick.”

  =How I Won my Bee Certificate.=

  =Little Tapers.= By the Rev. FREDERICK LANGBRIDGE, M.A.

  =Bound for Life.= A Story. By GRACE STEBBING.

  =The Cuisine of Foreign Countries.= By a Traveller.

  =June-Time and Roses.= A Poem.

  =Gipsies.= Song and Chorus for Girls’ Voices. By ETHEL HARRADEN.

  =Two Noble Women of Hawaii.= By SUSAN E. PINDER.

  =How to make the most of Life.= By C. E. SKINNER.

  =The Forest Princess.= A Short Story. By MARY E. HULLAH.

  =Autobiography of a Perambulator.= By ANNE BEALE.

  =Rachel.= A Rustic Idyll. By ISABEL S. JACOMB-HOOD.

  =A Seaside Holiday.= By CLOTILDA MARSON.

  =What the Hollyhocks and Lilies Saw.= By GERTRUDE PAGE.

  =Three of Shakespeare’s Heroines.= By C. H. IRWIN.

  =There is Plenty of Room on the Top.= A True Story. By ADA. M.
      TROTTER.

  =The Quaint and Grotesque in Embroidery.= By FRED MILLER.

  =To the Golden City.= By HENRY FINCH-LEE.

  =Swimming for Girls.=

  =Olive Digby’s Ordeal.= By HELEN MARION BURNSIDE.

  =“Who’d have thought it!”= By ELEANOR C. SALTMER.

  =New Puzzle for our Extra Summer Part.=

  =Varieties.=

  =Household Hints.=

FOOTNOTES:

[3] Evening primrose (_Œnothera fruticosa_).





End of the Project Gutenberg EBook of The Girl's Own Paper, Vol. XX. No.
1013, May 27, 1899, by Various

*** END OF THIS PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK THE GIRL'S OWN PAPER ***

***** This file should be named 60053-0.txt or 60053-0.zip *****
This and all associated files of various formats will be found in:
        http://www.gutenberg.org/6/0/0/5/60053/

Produced by Susan Skinner, Chris Curnow, Pamela Patten and
the Online Distributed Proofreading Team at
http://www.pgdp.net


Updated editions will replace the previous one--the old editions
will be renamed.

Creating the works from public domain print editions means that no
one owns a United States copyright in these works, so the Foundation
(and you!) can copy and distribute it in the United States without
permission and without paying copyright royalties.  Special rules,
set forth in the General Terms of Use part of this license, apply to
copying and distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works to
protect the PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm concept and trademark.  Project
Gutenberg is a registered trademark, and may not be used if you
charge for the eBooks, unless you receive specific permission.  If you
do not charge anything for copies of this eBook, complying with the
rules is very easy.  You may use this eBook for nearly any purpose
such as creation of derivative works, reports, performances and
research.  They may be modified and printed and given away--you may do
practically ANYTHING with public domain eBooks.  Redistribution is
subject to the trademark license, especially commercial
redistribution.



*** START: FULL LICENSE ***

THE FULL PROJECT GUTENBERG LICENSE
PLEASE READ THIS BEFORE YOU DISTRIBUTE OR USE THIS WORK

To protect the Project Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting the free
distribution of electronic works, by using or distributing this work
(or any other work associated in any way with the phrase "Project
Gutenberg"), you agree to comply with all the terms of the Full Project
Gutenberg-tm License (available with this file or online at
http://gutenberg.org/license).


Section 1.  General Terms of Use and Redistributing Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic works

1.A.  By reading or using any part of this Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work, you indicate that you have read, understand, agree to
and accept all the terms of this license and intellectual property
(trademark/copyright) agreement.  If you do not agree to abide by all
the terms of this agreement, you must cease using and return or destroy
all copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in your possession.
If you paid a fee for obtaining a copy of or access to a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work and you do not agree to be bound by the
terms of this agreement, you may obtain a refund from the person or
entity to whom you paid the fee as set forth in paragraph 1.E.8.

1.B.  "Project Gutenberg" is a registered trademark.  It may only be
used on or associated in any way with an electronic work by people who
agree to be bound by the terms of this agreement.  There are a few
things that you can do with most Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works
even without complying with the full terms of this agreement.  See
paragraph 1.C below.  There are a lot of things you can do with Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works if you follow the terms of this agreement
and help preserve free future access to Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works.  See paragraph 1.E below.

1.C.  The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation ("the Foundation"
or PGLAF), owns a compilation copyright in the collection of Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works.  Nearly all the individual works in the
collection are in the public domain in the United States.  If an
individual work is in the public domain in the United States and you are
located in the United States, we do not claim a right to prevent you from
copying, distributing, performing, displaying or creating derivative
works based on the work as long as all references to Project Gutenberg
are removed.  Of course, we hope that you will support the Project
Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting free access to electronic works by
freely sharing Project Gutenberg-tm works in compliance with the terms of
this agreement for keeping the Project Gutenberg-tm name associated with
the work.  You can easily comply with the terms of this agreement by
keeping this work in the same format with its attached full Project
Gutenberg-tm License when you share it without charge with others.

1.D.  The copyright laws of the place where you are located also govern
what you can do with this work.  Copyright laws in most countries are in
a constant state of change.  If you are outside the United States, check
the laws of your country in addition to the terms of this agreement
before downloading, copying, displaying, performing, distributing or
creating derivative works based on this work or any other Project
Gutenberg-tm work.  The Foundation makes no representations concerning
the copyright status of any work in any country outside the United
States.

1.E.  Unless you have removed all references to Project Gutenberg:

1.E.1.  The following sentence, with active links to, or other immediate
access to, the full Project Gutenberg-tm License must appear prominently
whenever any copy of a Project Gutenberg-tm work (any work on which the
phrase "Project Gutenberg" appears, or with which the phrase "Project
Gutenberg" is associated) is accessed, displayed, performed, viewed,
copied or distributed:

This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
almost no restrictions whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
with this eBook or online at www.gutenberg.org/license

1.E.2.  If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is derived
from the public domain (does not contain a notice indicating that it is
posted with permission of the copyright holder), the work can be copied
and distributed to anyone in the United States without paying any fees
or charges.  If you are redistributing or providing access to a work
with the phrase "Project Gutenberg" associated with or appearing on the
work, you must comply either with the requirements of paragraphs 1.E.1
through 1.E.7 or obtain permission for the use of the work and the
Project Gutenberg-tm trademark as set forth in paragraphs 1.E.8 or
1.E.9.

1.E.3.  If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is posted
with the permission of the copyright holder, your use and distribution
must comply with both paragraphs 1.E.1 through 1.E.7 and any additional
terms imposed by the copyright holder.  Additional terms will be linked
to the Project Gutenberg-tm License for all works posted with the
permission of the copyright holder found at the beginning of this work.

1.E.4.  Do not unlink or detach or remove the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License terms from this work, or any files containing a part of this
work or any other work associated with Project Gutenberg-tm.

1.E.5.  Do not copy, display, perform, distribute or redistribute this
electronic work, or any part of this electronic work, without
prominently displaying the sentence set forth in paragraph 1.E.1 with
active links or immediate access to the full terms of the Project
Gutenberg-tm License.

1.E.6.  You may convert to and distribute this work in any binary,
compressed, marked up, nonproprietary or proprietary form, including any
word processing or hypertext form.  However, if you provide access to or
distribute copies of a Project Gutenberg-tm work in a format other than
"Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other format used in the official version
posted on the official Project Gutenberg-tm web site (www.gutenberg.org),
you must, at no additional cost, fee or expense to the user, provide a
copy, a means of exporting a copy, or a means of obtaining a copy upon
request, of the work in its original "Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other
form.  Any alternate format must include the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License as specified in paragraph 1.E.1.

1.E.7.  Do not charge a fee for access to, viewing, displaying,
performing, copying or distributing any Project Gutenberg-tm works
unless you comply with paragraph 1.E.8 or 1.E.9.

1.E.8.  You may charge a reasonable fee for copies of or providing
access to or distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works provided
that

- You pay a royalty fee of 20% of the gross profits you derive from
     the use of Project Gutenberg-tm works calculated using the method
     you already use to calculate your applicable taxes.  The fee is
     owed to the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark, but he
     has agreed to donate royalties under this paragraph to the
     Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation.  Royalty payments
     must be paid within 60 days following each date on which you
     prepare (or are legally required to prepare) your periodic tax
     returns.  Royalty payments should be clearly marked as such and
     sent to the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation at the
     address specified in Section 4, "Information about donations to
     the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation."

- You provide a full refund of any money paid by a user who notifies
     you in writing (or by e-mail) within 30 days of receipt that s/he
     does not agree to the terms of the full Project Gutenberg-tm
     License.  You must require such a user to return or
     destroy all copies of the works possessed in a physical medium
     and discontinue all use of and all access to other copies of
     Project Gutenberg-tm works.

- You provide, in accordance with paragraph 1.F.3, a full refund of any
     money paid for a work or a replacement copy, if a defect in the
     electronic work is discovered and reported to you within 90 days
     of receipt of the work.

- You comply with all other terms of this agreement for free
     distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm works.

1.E.9.  If you wish to charge a fee or distribute a Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work or group of works on different terms than are set
forth in this agreement, you must obtain permission in writing from
both the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation and Michael
Hart, the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark.  Contact the
Foundation as set forth in Section 3 below.

1.F.

1.F.1.  Project Gutenberg volunteers and employees expend considerable
effort to identify, do copyright research on, transcribe and proofread
public domain works in creating the Project Gutenberg-tm
collection.  Despite these efforts, Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works, and the medium on which they may be stored, may contain
"Defects," such as, but not limited to, incomplete, inaccurate or
corrupt data, transcription errors, a copyright or other intellectual
property infringement, a defective or damaged disk or other medium, a
computer virus, or computer codes that damage or cannot be read by
your equipment.

1.F.2.  LIMITED WARRANTY, DISCLAIMER OF DAMAGES - Except for the "Right
of Replacement or Refund" described in paragraph 1.F.3, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation, the owner of the Project
Gutenberg-tm trademark, and any other party distributing a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work under this agreement, disclaim all
liability to you for damages, costs and expenses, including legal
fees.  YOU AGREE THAT YOU HAVE NO REMEDIES FOR NEGLIGENCE, STRICT
LIABILITY, BREACH OF WARRANTY OR BREACH OF CONTRACT EXCEPT THOSE
PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH 1.F.3.  YOU AGREE THAT THE FOUNDATION, THE
TRADEMARK OWNER, AND ANY DISTRIBUTOR UNDER THIS AGREEMENT WILL NOT BE
LIABLE TO YOU FOR ACTUAL, DIRECT, INDIRECT, CONSEQUENTIAL, PUNITIVE OR
INCIDENTAL DAMAGES EVEN IF YOU GIVE NOTICE OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH
DAMAGE.

1.F.3.  LIMITED RIGHT OF REPLACEMENT OR REFUND - If you discover a
defect in this electronic work within 90 days of receiving it, you can
receive a refund of the money (if any) you paid for it by sending a
written explanation to the person you received the work from.  If you
received the work on a physical medium, you must return the medium with
your written explanation.  The person or entity that provided you with
the defective work may elect to provide a replacement copy in lieu of a
refund.  If you received the work electronically, the person or entity
providing it to you may choose to give you a second opportunity to
receive the work electronically in lieu of a refund.  If the second copy
is also defective, you may demand a refund in writing without further
opportunities to fix the problem.

1.F.4.  Except for the limited right of replacement or refund set forth
in paragraph 1.F.3, this work is provided to you 'AS-IS' WITH NO OTHER
WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO
WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY OR FITNESS FOR ANY PURPOSE.

1.F.5.  Some states do not allow disclaimers of certain implied
warranties or the exclusion or limitation of certain types of damages.
If any disclaimer or limitation set forth in this agreement violates the
law of the state applicable to this agreement, the agreement shall be
interpreted to make the maximum disclaimer or limitation permitted by
the applicable state law.  The invalidity or unenforceability of any
provision of this agreement shall not void the remaining provisions.

1.F.6.  INDEMNITY - You agree to indemnify and hold the Foundation, the
trademark owner, any agent or employee of the Foundation, anyone
providing copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in accordance
with this agreement, and any volunteers associated with the production,
promotion and distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works,
harmless from all liability, costs and expenses, including legal fees,
that arise directly or indirectly from any of the following which you do
or cause to occur: (a) distribution of this or any Project Gutenberg-tm
work, (b) alteration, modification, or additions or deletions to any
Project Gutenberg-tm work, and (c) any Defect you cause.


Section  2.  Information about the Mission of Project Gutenberg-tm

Project Gutenberg-tm is synonymous with the free distribution of
electronic works in formats readable by the widest variety of computers
including obsolete, old, middle-aged and new computers.  It exists
because of the efforts of hundreds of volunteers and donations from
people in all walks of life.

Volunteers and financial support to provide volunteers with the
assistance they need, are critical to reaching Project Gutenberg-tm's
goals and ensuring that the Project Gutenberg-tm collection will
remain freely available for generations to come.  In 2001, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation was created to provide a secure
and permanent future for Project Gutenberg-tm and future generations.
To learn more about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation
and how your efforts and donations can help, see Sections 3 and 4
and the Foundation web page at http://www.pglaf.org.


Section 3.  Information about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive
Foundation

The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation is a non profit
501(c)(3) educational corporation organized under the laws of the
state of Mississippi and granted tax exempt status by the Internal
Revenue Service.  The Foundation's EIN or federal tax identification
number is 64-6221541.  Its 501(c)(3) letter is posted at
http://pglaf.org/fundraising.  Contributions to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation are tax deductible to the full extent
permitted by U.S. federal laws and your state's laws.

The Foundation's principal office is located at 4557 Melan Dr. S.
Fairbanks, AK, 99712., but its volunteers and employees are scattered
throughout numerous locations.  Its business office is located at
809 North 1500 West, Salt Lake City, UT 84116, (801) 596-1887, email
business@pglaf.org.  Email contact links and up to date contact
information can be found at the Foundation's web site and official
page at http://pglaf.org

For additional contact information:
     Dr. Gregory B. Newby
     Chief Executive and Director
     gbnewby@pglaf.org


Section 4.  Information about Donations to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation

Project Gutenberg-tm depends upon and cannot survive without wide
spread public support and donations to carry out its mission of
increasing the number of public domain and licensed works that can be
freely distributed in machine readable form accessible by the widest
array of equipment including outdated equipment.  Many small donations
($1 to $5,000) are particularly important to maintaining tax exempt
status with the IRS.

The Foundation is committed to complying with the laws regulating
charities and charitable donations in all 50 states of the United
States.  Compliance requirements are not uniform and it takes a
considerable effort, much paperwork and many fees to meet and keep up
with these requirements.  We do not solicit donations in locations
where we have not received written confirmation of compliance.  To
SEND DONATIONS or determine the status of compliance for any
particular state visit http://pglaf.org

While we cannot and do not solicit contributions from states where we
have not met the solicitation requirements, we know of no prohibition
against accepting unsolicited donations from donors in such states who
approach us with offers to donate.

International donations are gratefully accepted, but we cannot make
any statements concerning tax treatment of donations received from
outside the United States.  U.S. laws alone swamp our small staff.

Please check the Project Gutenberg Web pages for current donation
methods and addresses.  Donations are accepted in a number of other
ways including checks, online payments and credit card donations.
To donate, please visit: http://pglaf.org/donate


Section 5.  General Information About Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works.

Professor Michael S. Hart is the originator of the Project Gutenberg-tm
concept of a library of electronic works that could be freely shared
with anyone.  For thirty years, he produced and distributed Project
Gutenberg-tm eBooks with only a loose network of volunteer support.


Project Gutenberg-tm eBooks are often created from several printed
editions, all of which are confirmed as Public Domain in the U.S.
unless a copyright notice is included.  Thus, we do not necessarily
keep eBooks in compliance with any particular paper edition.


Most people start at our Web site which has the main PG search facility:

     http://www.gutenberg.org

This Web site includes information about Project Gutenberg-tm,
including how to make donations to the Project Gutenberg Literary
Archive Foundation, how to help produce our new eBooks, and how to
subscribe to our email newsletter to hear about new eBooks.